Introduction
Definitions
Whose personal data does Inverid process?
Who is responsible for the processing of your personal data?
What personal data does Inverid process?
How does Inverid obtain your personal data?
Why and on what grounds does Inverid process personal data?
How long does Inverid keep your personal data?
Does Inverid transfer your personal data to other parties and to countries outside the EU?
Is my data secure?
What are your rights?
When do you contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO)?
Can we change this Privacy Policy?
1. Introduction
In this Privacy Policy, we explain how and on what basis Inverid collects, stores and processes personal data of data subjects, i.e., our customer’s representatives, users of our services, job applicants, and visitors (see definitions below). We also explain what data subjects’ rights are and our obligations and liabilities. With examples we make this information easier to understand.
Inverid’s core business is providing the ReadID identity verification technology based on chips in government-issued identity documents. ReadID is in most cases provided as a cloud (software-as-a-service or SaaS) service in which we process users’ personal data as instructed by our customers. In this case, our customers are the controllers who determine the purpose of the processing of the users’ personal data and, accordingly, Inverid is a processor of user information with respect to those services. In order to fully understand how personal data is processed, data subjects should also review the privacy policy of our customers for whose services they are actually getting verified for.
Besides offering ReadID as a cloud service, we also have a so-called client-only version, where the verification of the chip happens solely in the user’s phone and therefore there is no processing of personal data by Inverid on its servers. Our publicly available ReadID Me app for example uses the client-only version of ReadID.
In other cases, Inverid is a data controller of personal data, for instance regarding visitors of our website and representatives of customers asking for support. We may also process certain anonymised information of ReadID users for the development and improvement of our services and in other forms and purposes.
Naturally, in all cases we handle the data with care.
2. Definitions
Here you can find the meaning of the most important terms in this Privacy Policy to help you understand how and for what we are processing your personal data.
Data controller
: a legal person, public authority, agency, or other body which, alone or jointly with others, determines the purposes and means of the processing of personal data and gives instructions regarding processing activities to Inverid, unless Inverid is acting as the data controller.
Data processor
: Inverid processes personal data on behalf of the data controller, unless Inverid is acting as the data controller. Inverid may use sub-processors who, under the authority of the controller, are authorised to process personal data.
Data subject / you
: a natural person about whom we have information or data enabling the identification of the natural person. Data subjects include our customers’ representatives, users that make use of our identity verification services, visitors of our website, job applicants, and other natural persons whose personal data we may process.
Customer
: the legal entity to whom we provide our services under a contractual agreement.
Personal data
: information that directly or indirectly identifies you as a person (i.e., the data subject), such as your name and address, email address or telephone number. Information about a legal entity is not personal data, but information about a contact person or representative of a legal entity is.
Processing
: any operation which is performed on personal data, such as the collection, storage, use, provision, transmission, and deletion of it.
ReadID SaaS user
: a natural person regarding whom we provide the ReadID service at the request of the customer. This could be via the Inverid ready-to-use ReadID Ready app or via the ReadID SaaS Software Development Kit (SDK) that the customer can integrate in its own mobile application. Both the Ready app and SDK communicate with a SaaS Server provided by a public cloud provider and that does all the actual data processing and verifications.
ReadID Me user
: a natural person that uses our personal and client-only ReadID Me application.
ReadID Client-Only user
: a user of the client-only version of ReadID provided by a customer.
Representative of the customer
: a natural person who interacts with Inverid as the representative of a customer prior to the conclusion of the contractual agreement and under the agreement.
Visitor
: any person who shows an interest in Inverid or in our ReadID products and services, e.g., visitors of our website, readers of our newsletter, attendees of our webinars, explorers of vulnerabilities in our systems, or potential new employees.
3. Whose personal data does Inverid process?
Inverid processes the personal data of:
ReadID SaaS users, as a processor for our customers, i.e., the data controllers.
Representatives of customers, as a data controller.
Visitors, as a data controller.
We do not process personal data of ReadID Me users as all personal data remains on the mobile phone running the ReadID Me application. The same applies to customers that make use of the client-only version of ReadID, since Inverid does not receive any personal data. In these cases, the customer is fully responsible for the privacy of the personal data being processed. For transparency reasons, however, we have included the client-only use of ReadID in the privacy policy.
4. Who is responsible for the processing of your personal data?
This Privacy Policy covers the processing of personal data by Inverid B.V. (the Netherlands), Inverid Software B.V. (the Netherlands) and Inverid Ltd (UK). Apart from ReadID SaaS data, personal data may be shared between these legal entities to the extent that this is permitted by law.
For the ReadID SaaS services, Inverid is processing personal data on behalf of a customer. The customer in that case is the data controller and Inverid the data processor.
5. What personal data does Inverid process?
Personal data we process about ReadID SaaS users
: Inverid provides identity verification services to its customers. This means we verify your identity. For that you (i.e., the ReadID SaaS user) have acknowledged data processing according to the customer’s privacy policy and subsequent data processing by us in accordance with this Privacy Policy. We may collect and process the following personal data:
Personal data present in the chip of a supported identity document presented by the user, e.g., a passport, identity card or driving license.
Personal data present on the holder page (back and front) of the presented identity document.
A face biometric scan (to verify that a User is the right person by matching it with the face image from the identity document).
IP-address of the user.
This dataset or part of it, combined with non-personal data such as the outcomes of the various verifications we conduct, is shared with the customer conform a data processing agreement.
For ReadID SaaS performance improvement purposes we need to collect anonymous usage information, for example, to detect problems with identity documents from certain countries. This usage information does not contain personal data. Moreover, Inverid cannot directly or indirectly relate the usage information to a specific person. Usage information will only be used for improving the quality of ReadID and not for other purposes. Inverid will only retain the information for as long as is necessary to fulfil the specified purpose.
Specifically, Inverid collects the following usage information via the ReadID SaaS SDK:
Phone details, including phone type, Android version, iOS version, memory size. We do not collect information that is unique for a certain phone.
What type of identity document was scanned and read, whether or not the scan was successful, the chip was read successfully, what country issued the identity document, the document signing certificate as stored on the chip, and the date of expiry. We collect the date of expiry since this allows us to determine the version of the scanned identity document.
Usability information: how long the different steps take if a user managed to go through all steps and usage frequency.
Inverid uses servers under its own control and specific usage analytics data is hosted by a third party.
Personal data we process about representatives of customers
: To enter into an agreement with Inverid, to provide our service, to communicate with the representative of our customer and for other lawful reasons we need to process the data of customer’s representatives. This means we may process, among other information, the following personal data of Representatives of the customer:
personal information of the representative of the customer, such as name, job title, position, and contact information;
personal information in connection with provision of the service, such as the representative’s login information to the ReadID management portal including username, email address, and mobile phone number.
Personal data we process about visitors
: We may collect data when you visit for instance our website (e.g., by using cookies), receive our newsletter (e.g., upon subscription), attend an Inverid webinar (e.g., upon registration) and/or apply for a job position at Inverid. This personal data, among other information, may be as follows:
personal information, such as IP address, time, and location;
information on usage of the website, such as the pages you visit, the date and time of your visit, the files that you download and the URLs from the websites you visit before and after navigating to the website;
e-mail addresses, when you subscribe to Inverid’s newsletters, download Inverid’s content or register for an Inverid webinar;
name and email address if you decide to contact Inverid related to reporting an issue mentioned in our
Coordinated Vulnerability Disclosure Policy
. If you consent, we may also disclose your name in our
Hall of Fame
.
curriculum vitae and motivation letters for job applicants.
Personal data we process about ReadID Me users
: Inverid provides the ReadID Me application through the Play Store and the App Store. ReadID Me is for your personal use and publicly available free of charge. We provide this app so Users can see what is in the chip of their identity document. In addition, the analytics and feedback we get helps us to improve the underlying ReadID software. The ReadID Me app runs client-only. This means that the app processes the data to access the chip and the personal data read from it locally on the smartphone of the ReadID Me user and does not share them with Inverid, i.e., the app does not send personal data to a server for processing by Inverid. Moreover, the personal information that is processed is not stored on the smartphone. Inverid thus does not collect personal information. We do not know nor want to know who the ReadID Me users are and whose identity documents are scanned.
Similar as for ReadID SaaS, ReadID Me collects anonymous usage information that will be used by Inverid to improve our ReadID services (see section above for ReadID SaaS users).
Personal data we process about ReadID Client-Only users:
In this case, Inverid does not process any personal data about the user. The customer may process personal data and is fully responsible for the privacy of any personal data being processed. Moreover, Inverid also does not collect any anonymised usage data.
6. How does Inverid obtain your personal data?
How we obtain personal data of a ReadID SaaS user
: We receive your personal data through an identity verification we conduct for a customer service that you use. The customer has contractually authorised us to process your data on behalf of them in the context of a certain service.
How we obtain personal data of a customer’s representative
: We collect this data either from you directly when you communicate with us directly, e.g., by sending us an email, providing us with your personal data on the phone or through our customer support tools. We may also collect some of your personal data during the provision of our service to your employer. We also check information about the customer (including about relevant representatives of the customer) from publicly available sources. We only gather relevant and necessary data in order to validate the right of representation e.g., this may include verification of your identity, processing of your personal data for operating our service, etc.
How we obtain personal data about visitors
: When you visit our website, we use cookies to collect information. The purpose of these cookies is to improve the user experience of your visit to our website and to provide Inverid with information that can be used for future optimisations. The cookies originate from HubSpot, HotJar, YouTube and DoubleClick.
Our website uses different types of cookies:
Strictly necessary cookies - These cookies are necessary for the proper functioning of the website and cannot be disabled.
Preference cookies - These cookies enable the website to remember information that affects the behaviour and design of the website.
Analytical cookies - These cookies help us understand how visitors interact with our website by collecting and reporting information anonymously.
Targeting cookies -These cookies are used for targeting purposes. They can be used to build a profile of interests of website visitors, so that relevant advertisements can be shown. They do not store directly identifiable personal information.
You can modify previously stored cookie settings/preferences via the cookie settings button on our website.
Cookie Settings
Moreover, you can always delete all cookies currently stored in the internet browser on your device.
For job applicants, we use the HomeRun recruitment platform for the processing of job application forms and associated personal data. Please refer to the
HomeRun privacy policy
for more details.
For our newsletter, the downloading of content, attending webinars or apply for a job at Inverid, you provide your personal data yourself.
How we obtain personal data of ReadID Me users
: Personal data is not collected via the use of our ReadID Me app. This app is for personal use only. Non-personal metadata (see above) is collected during the usage of the app.
How we obtain personal data of ReadID Client-Only users
: In this case, Inverid does not obtain any personal or other data from the app.
7. Why and on what grounds does Inverid process personal data?
We may only process your personal data if there is a so-called 'lawful basis' for doing so.
Grounds for the processing of personal data of a ReadID SaaS user
: We process your personal data as a processor for the benefit of the customer in order to fulfil the agreement we have with the customer. The lawful basis for the processing of the data thus stems from the customer and the service it is providing to you. So, please consult the privacy policy or statement of the customer as well for this purpose. There may also be a legitimate interest for the processing to be able to offer the best possible service on the market. This includes troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, fraud prevention and detection, system maintenance, support, reporting and hosting of data.
Grounds for the processing of personal data of customer representatives
: We mainly process your personal data in the establishment and execution of the contractual agreement with our customer, i.e., your employer. There may also be a legitimate interest for ensuring a trust-based relationship with customers. For example, the processing of personal data that is strictly necessary to determine the ultimate beneficiaries in order to prevent, e.g., fraud. Or, for conducting product and market research for purposes of quality assurance, product improvements, developments and assessing its market fit. This may include contacting and communication, interviews, recording of such communications for a limited period of time, etc. with existing and potential new customer representatives.
Grounds for the processing of personal data of a visitor
: Data processing of visitors is typically based on consent given by you. Consent may be asked for the cookies that we use on our website or when you subscribe to our free newsletter by providing your e-mail address. In case we rely on your consent for the processing of your data, you have the right to revoke your consent at any time. Please note that any processing Inverid carried out before the withdrawal of your consent remains lawful. If you withdraw your consent, we may not be able to provide certain products or services to you. We will advise you if this is the case when you withdraw your consent. When you apply for a job, we have legitimate interest in the processing of your data.
Grounds for processing of data of ReadID Me users
: Inverid does not process any personal data in the context of ReadID Me, so there is no lawful basis required. Only non-personal data is processed in order to improve our ReadID identity verification product.
Grounds for processing of data of ReadID Client-Only user:
Inverid is not involved in any processing of personal data as a processor or controller. The customer in this case is the controller of the personal data and has its own ground for the processing of it.
Besides these grounds, there may also be legal obligations with respect to the processing of personal data in general. Inverid processes personal data in compliance to legal obligations such as tax obligations, court orders or police investigations.
When personal data processing is carried out for a new purpose different from that for which it was originally collected or is not based on the consent given by the data subject, i.e., you, we shall carefully assess the permissibility of such new processing.
8. How long does Inverid keep your personal data?
We do not keep your data longer than is necessary to serve the purposes for which we collected the data or the purposes for which data is reused and to comply with laws and regulations.
Retention periods for ReadID SaaS user data
: A hard-coded maximum retention period of 50 days is enforced for all ReadID SaaS sessions that contain personal data. The customer, however, is advised to set a smaller retention period, e.g., no more than a few days, and/or to immediately request us to delete the data after having received the sessions results. When a ReadID session is deleted, it is removed permanently from the database, but not from backups of the database. The retention time of the backup is maximum 14 days and can be made shorter at customer request. These backups are required to be able to recover from a serious incident.
In case we make use of sub-processors for performing face biometrics for identity document holder verification purposes or for doing optical processing of document images, we require them to keep any collected personal only as long as they need to achieve the purpose for which the data was collected. This is also set forth in the data processing annex of the contractual agreement with the customer.
In case there are reasonable grounds to believe that certain identity claims are fraudulent, the retention period may be extended for a certain period or until there are no reasonable grounds anymore.
Non-personal data that is collected during the ReadID Ready and SDK with SaaS sessions will be retained as long as needed to improve our services.
Retention periods for customer representative data
: Personal data processed in the context of the establishment of the agreement with the customer will be archived for seven (7) years after the ending of the contract. Personal data of representatives that require access to our ReadID management portal or related services will be removed immediately by Inverid after removal of the account.
Retention periods for visitor data
: This data is typically obtained with your consent. We will stop processing the data when you withdraw your consent (for instance by unsubscribing from our newsletter or Hall of Fame). Names listed in the Hall of Fame will be deleted after three (3) years. For job applicants that have submitted a CV and/or motivation letter and are not hired, their personal data will be removed after one (1) month.
Retention periods for ReadID Me user data
: Since this is non-personal data we keep it as long as we need it for improving our services.
Retention periods for ReadID Client-Only user data
: Since we do not process any personal data in this context, retention is not applicable. Please consult the privacy policy of the customer offering the client-only version of ReadID.
In general, if we no longer need the data for the purposes described above, the personal data will be permanently erased or anonymised. Where we have a legitimate legal reason, we may store personal information for longer than described above, for example, where we are under a binding legal order not to destroy information.
9. Does Inverid transfer your personal data to other parties and to countries outside the EU?
Unless stated otherwise in this Privacy Policy or noted otherwise to you separately, we may disclose your personal data to data controllers for whom we are data processors (e.g., our customers) and to our authorised service providers (sub-processors), as well as to persons who are legally entitled to receive your personal data. Inverid also uses external IT-suppliers and cookie service providers. We have diligently assessed that these external parties will comply with the data protection requirements.
Transfer of ReadID SaaS user data
: Inverid uses external service providers (sub-processors) to optically verify identity documents and to perform liveness detection and face comparison. We only share the necessary personal data which is necessary for these providers to perform their tasks.
The current authorized sub-processors engaged for the ReadID service are listed below. Each of these sub-processors have their own privacy policy, the link to that policy is also listed below.
Public cloud provider:
Amazon Web Services (AWS), Inc. We use various AWS regions depending on the location of our Customers. Current locations are Ireland, Frankfurt, London, and Sydney. The generic AWS privacy policy can be found here:
https://aws.amazon.com/privacy/
. Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL is the authorized representative of AWS, Inc. in the European Economic Area (EEA). Relevant to consult in this context are the AWS data processing annexes:
https://d1.awsstatic.com/legal/aws-gdpr/AWS_GDPR_DPA.pdf
and
https://d1.awsstatic.com/Supplementary_Addendum_to_the_AWS_GDPR_DPA.pdf
Open Telekom Cloud, T-Systems International GmbH, for data processing addendum see
https://open-telekom-cloud.com/_Resources/Persistent/d/8/0/d/d80d17f63186334ba36afcc6924a0e2b4575f3ef/open-telekom-cloud-supplementary-conditions-commissioned-processing-personal-data.pdf
.
Microsoft Azure, as a cold standby for continuity purposes. We have an agreement with Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited for the hosting of ReadID servers in Ireland as prime location. For a customer that is based in the EEA, processing of personal data shall always take place in EEA as well. The Azure privacy policy can be found here:
https://azure.microsoft.com/en-us/explore/trusted-cloud/privacy#:~:text=We%20do%20not%20share%20your,the%20services%20you%20have%20chosen
. The most recent data processing annex is here:
https://www.microsoft.com/licensing/docs/view/Microsoft-Products-and-Services-Data-Protection-Addendum-DPA
.
Biometric verification provider:
iProov Ltd,
iproov.com
, for privacy policy see
https://www.iproov.com/biometric-data-retention-schedule
.
Optical verification provider:
Veriff ÖU, http://www.veriff.com , for privacy policy see
https://www.veriff.com/privacy-notice
.
Onfido Ltd,
onfido.com
, for privacy policy see
https://onfido.com/privacy/
.
Please note that these sub-processors may also make use of sub-processors themselves.
Inverid only shares your personal data with external parties when this is allowed as per applicable privacy and data protection law. Inverid may provide personal data to external parties because:
it is necessary to execute the contract with you;
you consented to this;
Inverid has a legitimate interest;
Inverid is legally obliged to do so.
All our data is hosted and processed in the European Economic Area (EEA), except for personal data we process for ReadID customers that are located outside the EEA or that require us to perform optical or biometric verification by sub-processors. In the latter case the processing is done in the United Kingdom. Personal data can legally be transferred to the United Kingdom based on a decision of the European Commission on the adequacy of data protection. Please also refer to the privacy policy of the customer for further motivation of your personal data processing in this context.
Transfer of customer representatives’ data
: Customer representative’s personal data can be shared with our advertising and marketing partners, companies carrying out satisfaction surveys, debt collection agencies, credit registers, authorities and organizations intermediating or providing (electronic) mail, compliance, or payment services and the like. Personal data required for accessing ReadID session data may be shared with the public cloud providers mentioned above.
Transfer of visitor data
: Visitor data may be transferred to external IT-suppliers and cookie service providers. We have diligently assessed that these external parties will comply with the data protection requirements.
Transfer of ReadID Me user data
: Personal data is not processed by Inverid in this context. Metadata only is transferred to the above-mentioned public cloud providers for further processing.
Transfer of ReadID Client-Only data
: A transfer policy is not required since we do not process any personal data in this context. Please consult the privacy policy of the customer offering the client-only version of ReadID.
10. Is my data secure?
Inverid has taken the necessary organisational, technical, and contractual security measures to protect your personal data against accidental loss, unauthorised access, modification, or disclosure. Examples of organisational controls are: security policies regarding the processing of data, our security certifications and code of conduct. Technical controls involve encryption of personal data at rest and in transit and access controls including strong authentication. Contractually, these controls are laid down. Part of our contract with the customer is a Data Processing Annex which purpose is to protect ReadID users and customer representatives by setting out clear expectations regarding the handling of their personal data.
We have set up procedures to deal with any suspected personal data breaches, and we will notify our customer, any relevant data protection authority and even you directly of a breach where we are legally required to do so.
Within Inverid, people only have access to your personal data if this is necessary for their job function. All these persons also have a duty of confidentiality and are periodically screened.
We have a certified Management System for Information Security (ISO27001:2022) and Privacy Information (ISO27701:2019). As part of our certification, our security measures to protect your personal data are annually evaluated by an independent external auditor. All our sub-processors are at least ISO27001 certified as well.
11. What are your rights?
You have the right to:
request information on personal data we process and what we do with the personal data;
request access to your personal data;
request correction of your personal data;
request erasure of your personal data;
request to transfer your personal data (if technically and/or legally possible);
object to specific processing of the personal data;
revoke your consent.
To exercise these rights please send an email to
dpo@inverid.com
.
Please note that if your request concerns data we have processed as a processor (i.e., in the course of our service provision) you must submit your request to the customer who is the data controller of the processing of your personal data. We will inform you about this.
When you make use of your rights, we may need to request specific information from you to help us confirm your identity and ensure your right to access the relevant personal data (or to exercise any of your other legal rights). This is a security measure we take to help avoid your personal data being disclosed to a person who has no right to receive it.
We may also contact you to ask you for further information in relation to your request to help speed up our response.
We try to respond to all legitimate requests within one month. Occasionally it may take us longer than a month if your request is particularly complex or you have made a number of requests. In this case, we will notify you and keep you updated.
12. When do you contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO)?
Inverid has appointed a DPO. The DPO monitors the application and compliance with data protection laws such as the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR). If you are not satisfied with the way a question or complaint has been handled, you can contact the DPO via dpo@inverid.com. In addition, you can ask a question or file a complaint with the Dutch Data Protection Authority (Autoriteit Persoonsgegevens). Be aware that in most cases Inverid acts as a processor of personal data for its customers, i.e., the controllers. We may redirect you to the controller that is responsible for the processing of your personal data.
13. Can we change this Privacy Policy?
Yes, our Privacy Policy may change from time to time. You will always find the most up-to-date version of our Privacy Policy at: inverid.com/privacy and underlying web pages.
The current policy has been updated on 18-10-2024 and integrates the previous three separate privacy policies we had for our Inverid website and the various ReadID products in a single policy.
Want to learn more about privacy-friendly identity verification?
Contact a specialist
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.homerun.co/privacy-statement:
Organise your hiring
Manage your team
Pricing
Customers
Resources
Hiring Blog
Guides & articles with advice on all things hiring
Showcase
Job posts & career pages we love
Integrations
Boost your Homerun experience with integrations
Get Started with Homerun
Simple steps to get you up & running
Help Center
Articles to help you get the most out of Homerun
Hiring Templates
100+ free templates, from job descriptions to email templates
Explore all templates
Log in
Organise your hiring
Manage your team
Book a demo
Start free trial
Organise your hiring
Manage your team
Pricing
Customers
Resources
Hiring Blog
Guides & articles with advice on all things hiring
Showcase
Job posts & career pages we love
Integrations
Boost your Homerun experience with integrations
Get Started with Homerun
Simple steps to get you up & running
Help Center
Articles to help you get the most out of Homerun
Hiring Templates
100+ free templates, from job descriptions to email templates
Explore all templates
Log in
Hire your team
Manage your team
Book a demo
Log in
Hire your team
Manage your team
Book a demo
Start free trial
Privacy Statement
Current as of: 13 Sept 2023
‍
We are Homerun B.V., located at Singel 542, 1017 AZ Amsterdam, The Netherlands (hereafter referred to as “we” or “Homerun”). Trade Register number 66911524. Our VAT number is NL856750189B01. Email:
info@homerun.co
. We offer recruitment software that enables our customers to create a career page and personalized job openings.
If you visit one of the following websites of Homerun: www.homerun.co, www.artofwork.co, library.artofwork.co, interviews.artofwork.co, playbooks.homerun.co, updates.homerun.co (together the “Websites”) we may process your personal data. This Privacy Statement explains what personal data we collect from our website visitors, how we use the personal data we collect and for which purposes we use the collected personal data.
Notes
If you are using our
jobs website
at
https://jobs.homerun.co
or are applying for a job at Homerun, see our Candidate Privacy Statement at
https://www.homerun.co/jobs-privacy-statement
.
If you are
using a career page or applying for a job at one of our customers
, Homerun may process your personal data, not for our own purposes, but as a data processor on behalf of that customer. The customer makes all decisions regarding their candidates’ data and is therefore the controller of that data. For information about how they process your personal data, please refer to the privacy statement of the company you applied with or contact them directly.
We may collect the following personal data:
Newsletter Subscription: If you subscribe to our newsletter, we collect only your email address. We process this data based on your consent. You can unsubscribe at any time by following the link in every newsletter.
Demo Signup: If you sign up to get a demo of our product, we collect your name, email address, company name and some information about how you would intend to use our product. We use it only to reach out to you to schedule a demo and to interact with you about potentially becoming a Homerun customer. We process this data based on our legitimate interest, namely to grow our business by attracting new customers.
Partner Signup: If you sign up to become a Partner, we collect your name, email address, company name and some context about your company and the potential partnership. We use this information to contact you with more information about the Partner program. We process this data based on our legitimate interest, in this case to grow our business by establishing mutually beneficial partnerships with relevant companies.
Statistics: Automatically generated information regarding your use of the Websites. When you visit our Websites, we may gather information to be able to understand and improve how visitors use and experience our Websites, and in order to enable and track the success of our marketing efforts. We do this through Google’s analytics and marketing tools. We only process this kind of information with your consent, given through the popup. This data is always pseudonymized: the last part of the IP address is not processed as we do not want to identify individual users.
How long we keep your personal data
We will keep your personal data only for the period necessary to fulfill the purposes for which it was collected or processed, unless we have to keep it for legitimate business, tax or legal purposes. For newsletter subscribers, this means we store your email address until you unsubscribe, which can be done at any time. Our analytics data is retained for 14 months.
Sharing your personal data with third parties
We will not share your personal data with third parties unless it is needed in order to provide the requested service to you, or when we have a legal obligation to do so. Homerun does not and will not sell your data to any third party. We use third parties in order to provide our services, and those third parties may process your personal data as a result of that. We use
Mailchimp
to manage and send our email newsletters.
Google Analytics, Tag Manager, Hotjar and AdWords
are used to analyze the use of our Websites and for online marketing. We use
Webflow
and
Amazon Web Services
for our web hosting, our product videos are displayed through
Wistia
and
Vimeo
, and our cookie information and consent banner is provided by
Transcend
.
We have made appropriate contractual arrangements with these third parties for the protection of personal data. Some of these third parties are based outside the European Economic Area (EEA). We will always comply with the requirements of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) before we transfer any personal data outside the EEA. If you have any questions about the measures we have in place with our suppliers, please contact us using the contact details provided below.
Cookies
Some of the functionality of the website and some of the third parties mentioned above may use cookies. Cookies are text files or pieces of data that are set by our Website(s) into the browser on your computer or mobile device. The next time you visit, those cookies allow us to recognise your device or read back settings that were stored in the previous session.
Our Websites have a banner that informs you of the cookies we always set by default (functional, required for the website to work), and the cookies that are intended for commercial purposes, like analytics and marketing, which require your consent. If you do not provide consent, those cookies are not set.
‍
Below you find a table of the specific cookies that we may use on our Websites:
Name
Placed by
Purpose
Retention period
_ga
Google
Google Analytics
26 months
_gid
26 months
_ga_[ID]
26 months
_ga_UA-[ID]
26 months
_gcl_au
Google
Google Adsense: to analyze the conversion of our advertising initiatives
26 months
_homerun_sid
Homerun
To analyze the conversion of our advertizing initiatives
12 months
sbjs_*
intercom-id-*
Intercom
Customer Support Solution
12 months
tcm*
Transcend
Cookie banner preferences
-
wistia*
Wistia
Video player
-
_hj*
Hotjar
Understand user behaviour
12 months
You can also use the settings within your browser to control the cookies that are set on your computer.  To learn more, please look at the cookie settings available in your specific web browser(s):
Google Chrome
-
Firefox
-
Internet Explorer
-
Safari
. You may also visit
youronlinechoices.eu
for details on how to remove cookies of specific parties and for further information on cookies.
Google Calendar integration
Within Homerun's product, you can create events that will automatically show up in your Google Calendar. This is an optional feature for which you have to log into your Google account and grant access to your calendar. Homerun's use and transfer of information received from Google APIs will adhere to the
Google API Services User Data Policy
, including the Limited Use requirements. That means we will not use information from your Google account for any other purpose than providing this functionality to you. You can remove the Google Calendar integration at any time.
‍
Your rights
You have the right to obtain from us: information about how we process your personal data, as well as a copy of the personal data which we have stored about you. You also have the right to correct, update, shield or delete your personal data in our records, as well as to request data portability of your personal data to a third party, and to report any misuse of your personal data.
If you have any questions, comments or concerns about how we handle personal data or if you wish to make use of your rights described above, please contact us at
privacy@homerun.co
. If you have any complaints about this statement or about how we handle your personal data you can also file a complaint at the Dutch Data Protection Agency (Autoriteit Persoonsgegevens). For more information see
this page
.
How we update this Privacy Statement
We may update this privacy statement at a later stage. The updated privacy statement will be made available on the website and be effective immediately upon posting.
🍪 Heads up that we use cookies to improve our site and our ads. You can learn more about this in our
Cookie notice
.
More options
Accept all
Sub-policy 1
https://aws.amazon.com/privacy/:
Select your cookie preferences
We use essential cookies and similar tools that are necessary to provide our site and services. We use performance cookies to collect anonymous statistics, so we can understand how customers use our site and make improvements. Essential cookies cannot be deactivated, but you can choose “Customize” or “Decline” to decline performance cookies.
If you agree, AWS and approved third parties will also use cookies to provide useful site features, remember your preferences, and display relevant content, including relevant advertising. To accept or decline all non-essential cookies, choose “Accept” or “Decline.” To make more detailed choices, choose “Customize.”
Accept
Decline
Customize
We use cookies and similar tools (collectively, "cookies") for the following purposes.
Essential
Essential cookies are necessary to provide our site and services and cannot be deactivated. They are usually set in response to your actions on the site, such as setting your privacy preferences, signing in, or filling in forms.
Performance
Performance cookies provide anonymous statistics about how customers navigate our site so we can improve site experience and performance. Approved third parties may perform analytics on our behalf, but they cannot use the data for their own purposes.
Allow performance category
Allowed
Functional
Functional cookies help us provide useful site features, remember your preferences, and display relevant content. Approved third parties may set these cookies to provide certain site features. If you do not allow these cookies, then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Allow functional category
Allowed
Advertising
Advertising cookies may be set through our site by us or our advertising partners and help us deliver relevant marketing content. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less relevant advertising.
Allow advertising category
Allowed
Blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of our sites. You may review and change your choices at any time by selecting Cookie preferences in the footer of this site. We and selected third-parties use cookies or similar technologies as specified in the
AWS Cookie Notice
.
We display ads relevant to your interests on AWS sites and on other properties, including cross-context behavioral advertising. Cross-context behavioral advertising uses data from one site or app to advertise to you on a different company’s site or app.
To not allow AWS cross-context behavioral advertising based on cookies or similar technologies, select “Don't allow” and “Save privacy choices” below, or visit an AWS site with a legally-recognized decline signal enabled, such as the Global Privacy Control. If you delete your cookies or visit this site from a different browser or device, you will need to make your selection again. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please read our
AWS Cookie Notice
.
Cross-context behavioral ads
Allow
Don't allow
To not allow all other AWS cross-context behavioral advertising,
complete this form by email
.
For more information about how AWS handles your information, please read the
AWS Privacy Notice
.
We will only store essential cookies at this time, because we were unable to save your cookie preferences.
If you want to change your cookie preferences, try again later using the link in the AWS console footer, or contact support if the problem persists.
Skip to main content
Privacy Notice
Last Updated: February 21, 2025
To see prior version, click
here
.
This Privacy Notice describes how we collect and use your personal information in relation to AWS websites, applications, products, services, events, and experiences that reference this Privacy Notice (together, “AWS Offerings”).
This Privacy Notice does not apply to the “content” processed, stored, or hosted by our customers using AWS Offerings in connection with an AWS account. See the agreement governing your access to your AWS account and the
AWS Data Privacy FAQ
for more information about how we handle content and how our customers can control their content through AWS Offerings. This Privacy Notice also does not apply to any products, services, websites, or content that are offered by third parties or have their own privacy notice.
Personal Information We Collect
How We Use Personal Information
Cookies
How We Share Personal Information
Location of Personal Information
How We Secure Information
Access and Choice
Children’s Personal Information
Third Party Sites and Services
Retention of Personal Information
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions
Examples of Information Collected
Personal Information We Collect
We collect your personal information in the course of providing AWS Offerings to you.
Here are the types of information we gather:
Information You Give Us:
We collect any information you provide in relation to AWS Offerings. Click
here
to see examples of information you give us.
Automatic Information:
We automatically collect certain types of information when you interact with AWS Offerings. Click
here
to see examples of information we collect automatically.
Information from Other Sources:
We might collect information about you from other sources, including service providers, partners, and publicly available sources. Click
here
to see examples of information we collect from other sources.
How We Use Personal Information
We use your personal information to operate, provide, and improve AWS Offerings. Our purposes for using personal information include:
Provide AWS Offerings:
We use your personal information to provide and deliver AWS Offerings and process transactions related to AWS Offerings, including registrations, subscriptions, purchases, and payments.
Measure, Support, and Improve AWS Offerings:
We use your personal information to measure use of, analyze performance of, fix errors in, provide support for, improve, and develop AWS Offerings.
Recommendations and Personalization:
We use your personal information to recommend AWS Offerings that might be of interest to you, identify your preferences, and personalize your experience with AWS Offerings.
Comply with Legal Obligations:
In certain cases, we have a legal obligation to collect, use, or retain your personal information. For example, we collect bank account information from AWS Marketplace sellers for identity verification.
Communicate with You:
We use your personal information to communicate with you in relation to AWS Offerings via different channels (e.g., by phone, email, chat) and to respond to your requests.
Marketing:
We use your personal information to market and promote AWS Offerings.
Fraud and Abuse Prevention and Credit Risks:
We use your personal information to prevent and detect fraud and abuse in order to protect the security of our customers, AWS, and others. We may also use scoring methods to assess and manage credit risks.
Purposes for Which We Seek Your Consent:
We may also ask for your consent to use your personal information for a specific purpose that we communicate to you.
Cookies
To enable our systems to recognize your browser or device and to provide, market, and improve AWS Offerings, we and approved third parties use cookies and other identifiers. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please read our
Cookie Notice
.
How We Share Personal Information
Information about our customers is an important part of our business and we are not in the business of selling our customers’ personal information to others. We share personal information only as described below and with Amazon.com, Inc. and the affiliates that Amazon.com, Inc. controls that are either subject to this Privacy Notice or follow practices at least as protective as those described in this Privacy Notice.
Transactions Involving Third Parties:
We make available to you services, software, and content provided by third parties for use on or through AWS Offerings. You can tell when a third party is involved in your transactions, and we share information related to those transactions with that third party. For example, you can order services, software, and content from sellers using the AWS Marketplace and we provide those sellers information to facilitate your subscription, purchases, or support.
Third-Party Service Providers:
We employ other companies and individuals to perform functions on our behalf. Examples include: delivering AWS hardware, sending communications, processing payments, assessing credit and compliance risks, analyzing data, providing marketing and sales assistance (including advertising and event management), conducting customer relationship management, and providing training. These third-party service providers have access to personal information needed to perform their functions, but may not use it for other purposes. Further, they must process that information in accordance with this Privacy Notice and as permitted by applicable data protection law.
Business Transfers:
As we continue to develop our business, we might sell or buy businesses or services. In such transactions, personal information generally is one of the transferred business assets but remains subject to the promises made in any pre-existing Privacy Notice (unless, of course, the individual consents otherwise). Also, in the unlikely event that AWS or substantially all of its assets are acquired, your information will of course be one of the transferred assets.
Protection of Us and Others:
We release account and other personal information when we believe release is appropriate to comply with the law, enforce or apply our terms and other agreements, or protect the rights, property, or security of AWS, our customers, or others. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for fraud prevention and detection and credit risk reduction.
At Your Option:
Other than as set out above, you will receive notice when personal information about you might be shared with third parties, and you will have an opportunity to choose not to share the information.
Location of Personal Information
Amazon Web Services, Inc. is located in the United States, and our affiliated companies are located throughout the world. Depending on the scope of your interactions with AWS Offerings, your personal information may be stored in or accessed from multiple countries, including the United States. Whenever we transfer personal information to other jurisdictions, we will ensure that the information is transferred in accordance with this Privacy Notice and as permitted by applicable data protection laws.
How We Secure Information
At AWS, security is our highest priority. We design our systems with your security and privacy in mind.
We maintain a wide variety of compliance programs that validate our security controls. Click
here
to learn more about our compliance programs.
We protect the security of your information during transmission to or from AWS websites, applications, products, or services by using encryption protocols and software.
We follow the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard (PCI DSS) when handling credit card data.
We maintain physical, electronic, and procedural safeguards in connection with the collection, storage, and disclosure of personal information. Our security procedures mean that we may request proof of identity before we disclose personal information to you.
Access and Choice
You can view, update, and delete certain information about your account and your interactions with AWS Offerings. Click
here
for a list of examples of information that you can access. If you cannot access or update your information yourself, you can always contact us for assistance.
You have choices about the collection and use of your personal information. Many AWS Offerings include settings that provide you with options as to how your information is being used. You can choose not to provide certain information, but then you might not be able to take advantage of certain AWS Offerings.
Account Information:
If you want to add, update, or delete information related to your account, please go to the
AWS Management Console
. When you update or delete any information, we usually keep a copy of the prior version for our records.
Communications:
If you do not want to receive promotional messages from us, please unsubscribe or adjust your communication preferences in the
AWS Management Console
or the
AWS Email Preference Center
. If you do not want to receive in-app notifications from us, please adjust your notification settings in the app or your device.
Cookies Preferences:
You can change your cookie preferences on AWS sites at any time by clicking Cookie Preferences in the footer of the AWS site. You can also manage cookies through your browser settings.
The "Help" feature on most browsers and devices will tell you how to remove cookies from your device, how to prevent your browser or device from accepting new cookies, how to have the browser notify you when you receive a new cookie, or how to disable cookies altogether.
Sellers and Amazon Partners:
Sellers and Amazon Partner Network members can add, update, or delete information in the
AWS Marketplace
and
APN Partner Central
, respectively.
Children’s Personal Information
We don’t provide AWS Offerings for purchase by children. If you’re under 18, you may use AWS Offerings only with the involvement of a parent or guardian.
Third Party Sites and Services
AWS Offerings may embed content provided by others or include links to other websites and applications. These companies may collect information about you when you interact with their content or services. We are not responsible for the practices of these companies. Please consult their privacy policies to learn about their data practices.
Retention of Personal Information
We keep your personal information to enable your continued use of AWS Offerings, for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this Privacy Notice, as may be required by law (including for tax and accounting purposes), or as otherwise communicated to you. How long we retain specific personal information varies depending on the purpose for its use, and we will delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law.
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
If you have any concerns about privacy at AWS, please
contact us
with a thorough description, and we will try to resolve the issue for you.
For any prospective or current customers of Amazon Web Services, Inc., our mailing address is: Amazon Web Services, Inc., 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle, WA 98109-5210, ATTN: AWS Legal
Contact details for specific jurisdictions including the European Economic Area, the UK and Switzerland, can be found in “Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions” below.
If you interact with AWS Offerings on behalf of or through your organization, then your personal information may also be subject to your organization’s privacy practices, and you should direct privacy inquiries to your organization.
Our business changes constantly, and our Privacy Notice may also change. You should check our website frequently to see recent changes. You can see the date on which the latest version of this Privacy Notice was posted. Unless stated otherwise, our current Privacy Notice applies to all personal information we have about you and your account. We stand behind the promises we make, however, and will never materially change our policies and practices to make them less protective of personal information collected in the past without informing affected customers and giving them a choice.
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Amazon Web Services, Inc. participates in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework. Click
here
to learn more.
Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions
We provide additional information about our controllers and data protection officers (as applicable), the privacy, collection, and use of personal information of prospective and current customers of AWS Offerings located in certain jurisdictions.
Brazil
Controller of Personal Information
. When Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda. is the provider of an AWS Offering, Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda., A. Presidente Juscelino Kubitschek, 2.041, Torre E - 18th and 19th Floors, Vila Nova Conceicao, Sao Paulo, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering. The data protection officer for Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda. can be contacted at aws-brazil-privacy@amazon.com.
Processing
. We process your personal information on one or more of the following legal bases:
as necessary to enter into a contract with you or a legal entity you represent, to perform our contractual obligations, to provide AWS Offerings, to respond to requests from you, or to provide customer support;
where we have a legitimate interest, as described in this Privacy Notice (see How We Use Personal Information above);
as necessary to comply with relevant law and legal obligations, including to respond to lawful requests and orders; or
with your consent.
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information;
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means; and
request information about the possibility of refusing consent and the consequences of doing so.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
You can also file a complaint with Brazil’s National Data Protection Authority (ANPD) through its official channels.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Transfers outside of Brazil
. When we transfer your personal information outside Brazil, we do so in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Notice and applicable data protection law.
Canada
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements; and
lodge a complaint with us regarding our practices related to your personal information.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please
contact us
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or by mail at 120 Bremner Blvd, 26th Floor, Toronto, Ontario, M5J 0A8, Canada, ATTN: AWS Canada Legal. Further, the Amazon Web Services Canada, Inc. Privacy Officer can be contacted at
aws-canada-privacy@amazon.com
or by mail at the address noted above.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Costa Rica
Your Rights
. With respect to data collected and processed by Amazon Web Services Costa Rica (“AWS Costa Rica”), you have the rights of access, rectification, erasure, restriction, or complaint. When you consent to AWS Costa Rica processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and AWS Costa Rica will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please
contact us
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us at Zona Franca America, Edificio C7. 600 norte de Plaza Real Cariari, sobre la paralela a la Autopista General Cañas. San Francisco de Heredia, Costa Rica.
European Economic Area, UK, and Switzerland
Controller of Personal Information.
When Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL is the provider of an AWS Offering, Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL, 38 Avenue John F. Kennedy, L-1855, Luxembourg, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering.
Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL is also the authorized representative of Amazon Web Services, Inc. in the EEA.
Processing.
We process your personal information on one or more of the following legal bases:
as necessary to enter into a contract with you or a legal entity you represent, to perform our contractual obligations, to provide AWS Offerings, to respond to requests from you, or to provide customer support;
where we have a legitimate interest, as described in this Privacy Notice (see How We Use Personal Information above);
as necessary to comply with relevant law and legal obligations, including to respond to lawful requests and orders; or
with your consent.
Information We Retain After Your Account is Closed.
If you decide to terminate your agreement and close your AWS account, we will retain your content for a period of up to 90 days after account closure, during which you may still access part of the AWS Management Console in order to retrieve your billing documents and to contact customer support. During this period, you may also decide to reopen your AWS account. At the end of this period, we will delete any content remaining in your account.
After account closure, we may need to keep certain information for an additional period of time for legal and legitimate business purposes. For example, we may retain personal information such as your contact information (e.g., name, email address, physical address) and any invoices that AWS has sent to you (e.g., record of purchases, applicable discounts, and tax information) for tax and accounting purposes. If applicable, AWS may also retain records of communications with you, as well as relevant logs (e.g., a log of your account closure) for dispute resolution purposes. We further may keep records for preventing fraud and ensuring security, for example in case of misuse of our services or violation of our terms.
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information; and
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means.
Questions and Contacts.
If you wish to do any of these things or have a data-protection related question, and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
.
The data protection officer for Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL can be contacted at aws-EU-privacy@amazon.com.
You can also lodge a complaint with our principal supervisory authority, the
Commission Nationale pour la Protection des Données in Luxembourg
, or with a local authority.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Cookies.
Please refer to our
Cookie Notice
.
Transfers outside of the EEA.
When we transfer your personal information outside the EEA we do so in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Notice and applicable data protection law.
India
For any prospective or current customers of Amazon Web Services India Private Limited (formerly known as Amazon Internet Services Private Limited), our mailing address is: Amazon Web Services India Private Limited, Block E, 14th Floor, Unit Nos. 1401 to 1421, International Trade Tower, Nehru Place, New Delhi, Delhi 110019, India, ATTN: AWS India Legal.
Japan
Controller of Personal Information
Any personal information provided to or gathered by Amazon Web Services Japan G.K. is controlled primarily by Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., 3-1-1 Kamiosaki, Shinagawa-ku, Tokyo 141-0021 JAPAN.
Any personal information collected by Amazon Web Services, Inc. is controlled primarily by Amazon Web Services, Inc.
Use of Personal Information
We jointly use your personal information for such purposes as described in this Privacy Notice with domestic and foreign affiliates that Amazon.com, Inc. controls, including Amazon Web Services, Inc., Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL, and other global entities that either are subject to this Privacy Notice or follow practices at least as protective as those described in this Privacy Notice. Jointly used personal information includes personal information described under “Personal Information We Collect” and “Example of Information Collected” above. Amazon Web Services, Inc. is the business operator primarily responsible for managing jointly used personal information.
We share personal information with third parties only to the extent described under “How We Share Personal Information” above and in accordance with the Act on Protection of Personal Information.
When we share your personal information with third parties outside of Japan, such as sellers of products on AWS Marketplace and sponsors of AWS events, we require the recipients to adopt personal information security measures to protect your personal information.
Please see
here
for information on the countries where third parties may be located, and the applicable data privacy laws and data protection systems in these countries.
Your Rights
You may have the right to request access to or delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law. If you wish to submit a data subject access request, please
contact us
(for AWS customers) or contact us at our mailing address, Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., 3-1-1 Kamiosaki, Shinagawa-ku, Tokyo 141-0021 JAPAN, ATTN: AWS Japan Legal (for current or prospective customers of Amazon Web Services Japan G.K. and non-customers in Japan).
Malaysia
A Bahasa Malaysia translation of this Privacy Notice can be found
here
.
Nigeria
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Nigeria Limited, located at 3-5 Sinari Daranijo Street, Off Ajose Adeogun, Victoria Island, Lagos, Nigeria (“AWS Nigeria”), AWS Nigeria is the data controller.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information;
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means; and
request information about the possibility of refusing consent and the consequences of doing so.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS Nigeria customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
.
You can also file a complaint with Nigeria’s National Information Technology Development Agency through its official channels.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Peru
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Peru S.R.L., located at Av. Jorge Basadre 349 San Isidro, Lima (“AWS Peru”), AWS Peru is the data controller and the personal data bank holder of the following data banks: customers, prospective customers, and vendors.
Personal Information.
Depending on how you engage with AWS Peru, we may process one or more of the following kinds of personal information: name, identity card number, Tax ID, contact information (such as address, telephone, email address), profession, banking and credit card details, and physical or electronic signature. For more information about the personal information that we collect, click
here
.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information; and
exercise any other rights afforded by the Peruvian Personal Data Protection Regulations.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS Peru customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
You can also file a complaint before the Peruvian National Data Protection Authority through its official channels.
Data Processors and Transfers to Third Parties.
We may share your personal information as described in this Privacy Notice and as permitted by the Peruvian Personal Data Protection Regulations, including to Amazon Web Services Inc., located at 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle, WA 98109-5210, United States of America, for the purposes of providing services and engaging in marketing, business development, and sales efforts with respect to cloud services that Amazon Web Services, Inc. sells globally; and enabling the provision of data hosting, storage, and processing by Amazon Web Services, Inc. as AWS Peru’s data processor.
Philippines
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Philippines, Inc. (“AWS Philippines”), you may contact the Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) and Data Compliance Officer for Privacy (“COP”)
here
if you are an AWS Philippines customer. If you are not an AWS customer, you may contact the DPO and COP at 21st floor Arthaland Century Pacific Tower, 5th Avenue 1634 Bonifacio Global City, Taguig, Philippines.
South Africa
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services South Africa Proprietary Limited, located at 29 Gogosoa Street, Observatory, Cape Town, South Africa, 7925 (“AWS South Africa”), AWS South Africa is the responsible party.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
object, at any time to the processing of your personal information for purposes of direct marketing other than direct marketing by means of unsolicited electronic communications from AWS which is prohibited unless you give consent to receive such direct marketing;
object, at any time (at which point we will cease processing of your personal information), to the processing of your personal information if you feel the processing of that personal information is not necessary for protection of your legitimate interest/s; proper performance of a public law duty by a public body; or pursuance of the legitimate interests of AWS or of a third party to whom the information is supplied; and
to submit a complaint to the Information Regulator of South Africa regarding interference with the protection of your personal information.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS South Africa customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
The Information Regulator Contact Details. The Information Regulator of South Africa is located at: JD House, 27 Stiemens Street, Braamfontein, Johannesburg, 2001. P.O. Box 31533, Braamfontein, Johannesburg, 2017. You may direct general enquiries by email to:
enquiries@inforegulator.org.za
. You may direct complaints by email to:
POPIAComplaints@inforegulator.org.za
.
South Korea
AWS does not knowingly collect personal information from children under the age of 14 without the consent of the child's parent or guardian.
How We Share Personal Information
AWS may share personal information as described in this Privacy Notice, including with affiliates of Amazon Web Services, Inc.
AWS has contracts in place with the following third party service provider(s) (delegatees) to perform functions on behalf of AWS in Korea, and they may have access to your personal information as needed to perform their functions described below:
The details of delegation for event management can be found on the relevant event page.
AWS may share your personal information with the following third party service provider(s) outside of Korea as described below:
If you do not agree with the above-stated overseas transfers, please stop using AWS Services and close your AWS Account.
Deletion of Personal Information
AWS will delete your personal information (including after closure of your AWS account) as described in this Privacy Notice. When deleting personal information, AWS will take standard commercially reasonable measures to make the personal information practically irrecoverable or irreproducible. The specific manner of deletion will depend on the information being deleted, how the information was collected and stored, and your interactions with us. Electronic documents or files containing personal information will be deleted using a technical method that makes recovery or retrieval of such information practically impossible or renders the data no longer personally identifiable. Non-electronic documents or files containing personal information will be shredded, incinerated, or both.
Retention of Personal Information
AWS Korea keeps your personal information to enable your continued use of AWS Offerings, for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this Privacy Notice, as may be required by law (including for tax and accounting purposes as may be required by the Framework Act on National Taxes of Republic of Korea or other laws), or as otherwise communicated to you. How long we retain specific personal information varies depending on the purpose for its use, and we will delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law.
If you have any privacy questions or requests please contact:
AWS Korea Privacy
Email: aws-korea-privacy@amazon.com
Korean translation of this Privacy Notice can be found
here
.
Turkey
Controller of Personal Information.
When AWS Turkey Pazarlama Teknoloji ve Danışmanlık Hizmetleri Limited Şirketi is the provider of an AWS Offering, AWS Turkey Pazarlama Teknoloji ve Danışmanlık Hizmetleri Limited Şirketi, located at Esentepe Mahallesi Bahar Sk. Özdilek/River Plaza/Wyndham Grand Hotel Apt. No: 13/52 Şişli/İstanbul, Turkey, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering.
United States
These additional disclosures are required by certain state privacy laws to the extent they apply to your use of AWS Offerings, and serve as a Notice at Collection under the California Privacy Rights Act.
Categories of personal information collected
. The personal information that we may collect, or may have collected from consumers in the preceding twelve months, fall into the following categories established by the California Privacy Rights Act and other state privacy laws, depending on how you engage with the AWS Offerings:
Identifiers, such as your name, alias, address, phone numbers, or IP address, your AWS account log-in information, or a government-issued identifier (such as a state-issued ID number, which may be required to verify your identity when completing certain AWS certification courses, or an ID you provide for identity verification, which in some cases may reflect citizenship or immigration status);
personal information as described in subdivision (e) of Section 1798.80 of the California Civil Code, such as a credit card number or other payment information;
characteristics of protected classifications under California or US federal law, such as age, race, or gender or gender identity, for example if we conduct user surveys or analysis;
commercial information, such as purchase activity;
internet or other electronic network activity information, including content interaction information, such as content downloads, streams, and playback details;
information used to prevent and detect fraud or other unauthorized activity, including informing customers if such activity were to affect them;
biometric information, such as your voice or appearance, for example if you choose to participate in a demonstration of a speech or image recognition service;
geolocation data, which may in some cases constitute precise geolocation information, such as the location of your device or computer, for example if you enable location services to enhance your experience through event applications we offer;
audio, visual, electronic or other similar information, including when you communicate with us by phone or otherwise;
professional or employment-related information, for example data you may provide about your business;
inference data, such as information about your preferences; and
education information, such as information about enrollment status, fields of study, or degrees, honors, and awards received.
We collect this information from you, automatically through your interaction with the AWS Offerings, or from third parties. For more information about the personal information we collect, click
here
. We collect this information for the business and commercial purposes described in the “How We Use Personal Information” section above.
Categories of personal information disclosed for a business purpose
. The personal information that we may have disclosed about consumers for a business purpose in the preceding twelve months fall into the following categories established by the California Privacy Rights Act and other state privacy laws, depending on how you engage with the AWS Offerings:
Identifiers, such as your name, address, or phone numbers, for example if we use a third-party carrier to deliver AWS hardware, or government identifier or certain types of ID you provide for identity verification, which may in some cases reflect your citizenship or immigration status, for example if we use a third-party service to verify your identity;
personal information as described in subdivision (e) of Section 1798.80 of the California Civil Code, such as a credit card number or other payment information, for example if we use a third-party payment processor;
information that may reveal your age, gender or gender identity, race, or other protected classifications under California or US federal law, for example if we conduct user surveys or analysis using a third-party service provider;
commercial information, such as the details of a product or service you purchased if a third-party service provider assists in providing that product or service to you;
internet or other electronic network activity information, such as if we use a third-party service provider to help us gather reports for analyzing the health of our devices and services;
information relating to our prevention and detection of unauthorized activity, such as attempted fraud;
biometric information, for example if you choose to participate in a demonstration of certain AWS services facilitated by a third-party service provider;
geolocation data, which may constitute precise geolocation data, for example if we enable transportation services from a third party in connection with an AWS event;
audio, visual, electronic or other similar information, for example if a third-party service provider reviews recordings of customer support phone calls for quality assurance purposes;
professional or employment-related information, for example if we provide information to a third-party service provider for verification or registration as part of the AWS Offerings;
education information, for example if we facilitate employment or internship recruitment activities for participants in the AWS Educate program; and
inference data, for example if we use a third-party service provider to store information about your preferences.
For more information about the personal information we may disclose for a business purpose, click
here
.
Your Data Rights
. You may have certain data rights under state privacy laws, including to request information about the collection of your personal information by us, to access your personal information in a portable format, and to correct or delete your personal information. If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, or you are an authorized agent under applicable state law, please contact us
here
or at the address under
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
above. Additionally, you may have the right to appeal the denial of any of these rights by submitting a form that will be provided to you if we deny a data request. Depending on your data choices, certain services may be limited or unavailable.
To ensure the security of your AWS account, we will generally ask you to verify your request using the contact information you have already provided. If you are an authorized agent making a request on behalf of a consumer pursuant to applicable state law, we may ask you to provide information verifying you have proper authority to make the request on behalf of the consumer or we may ask the consumer to verify their identity with us directly.
No sale or sharing of personal information
. We do not sell or share any personal information of consumers, as those terms are defined under the California Privacy Rights Act.
De-identified Data Disclosure.
AWS may use de-identified data in some instances. AWS either maintains such data without attempting to re-identify it or treats such data as personal data subject to applicable law.
California Privacy Rights Act Sensitive Personal Information Disclosure
. The categories of data that we collect and disclose for a business purpose include “sensitive personal information” as defined under the California Privacy Rights Act. We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for any purpose not expressly permitted by the California Privacy Rights Act.
California Privacy Rights Act Retention Disclosure
. To enable your continued use of AWS Services, we keep your personal information for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this AWS Privacy Notice, as permitted or as may be required by law, or as otherwise communicated to you.
California Privacy Rights Act Non-Discrimination Statement
. We will not discriminate against any consumer for exercising their rights under the California Privacy Rights Act.
Colorado Privacy Act and Oregon Privacy Act Profiling Disclosure
. We do not engage in profiling of consumers in furtherance of automated decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects, as those terms are defined under the Colorado Privacy Act or the Oregon Privacy Act.
Examples of Information Collected
Information You Give Us
You provide information to us when you:
search for, subscribe to, or purchase AWS Offerings;
create or administer your AWS account (and you might have more than one account if you have used more than one email address when using AWS Offerings);
configure your settings for, provide data access permissions for, or otherwise interact with AWS Offerings;
register for or attend an AWS event;
purchase or use content, products, or services from third-party providers through the AWS Marketplace (or other similar venues operated or provided by us);
offer your content, products, or services on or through AWS Offerings or the AWS Marketplace (or other similar venues operated or provided by us);
communicate with us by phone, email, or otherwise;
complete a questionnaire, a support ticket, or other information request forms;
post on AWS websites or participate in community features; and
employ notification services.
Depending on your use of AWS Offerings, you might supply us with such information as:
your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
payment information, including credit card and bank account information;
information about your location;
information about your organization and your contacts, such as colleagues or people within your organization;
usernames, aliases, roles, and other authentication and security credential information;
content of feedback, testimonials, inquiries, support tickets, and any phone conversations, chat sessions and emails with or to us;
your image (still, video, and in some cases 3-D), voice, and other identifiers that are personal to you when you attend an AWS event or use certain AWS Offerings;
information regarding identity, including government-issued identification information;
corporate and financial information; and
VAT numbers and other tax identifiers.
Automatic Information
We collect information automatically when you:
visit, interact with, or use AWS Offerings (including when you use your computer or other device to interact with AWS Offerings);
download content from us;
open emails or click on links in emails from us; and
interact or communicate with us (such as when you attend an AWS event or when you request customer support).
Examples of the information we automatically collect include:
network and connection information, such as the Internet protocol (IP) address used to connect your computer or other device to the Internet and information about your Internet service provider;
computer and device information, such as device, application, or browser type and version, browser plug-in type and version, operating system, or time zone setting;
the location of your device or computer;
authentication and security credential information;
content interaction information, such as content downloads, streams, and playback details, including duration and number of simultaneous streams and downloads;
AWS Offerings metrics, such as offering usage, occurrences of technical errors, diagnostic reports, your settings preferences, backup information, API calls, and other logs;
the full Uniform Resource Locators (URL) clickstream to, through, and from our website (including date and time) and AWS Offerings, content you viewed or searched for, page response times, download errors, and page interaction information (such as scrolling, clicks, and mouse-overs);
email addresses and phone numbers used to contact us; and
identifiers and information contained in cookies (see our
Cookie Notice
).
Information from Other Sources
Examples of information we receive from other sources include:
marketing, sales generation, and recruitment information, including your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
subscription, purchase, support, or other information about your interactions with products and services offered by us, our affiliates (such as AWS training courses), or third parties (such as products offered through the AWS Marketplace) in relation to AWS Offerings;
search results and links, including paid listings (such as Sponsored Links); and
credit history information from credit bureaus.
Information You Can Access
Examples of information you can access through AWS Offerings include:
your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
usernames, aliases, roles, and other authentication and security credential information;
your subscription, purchase, usage, billing, and payment history;
payment settings, such as payment instrument information and billing preferences;
tax information;
email communication and notification settings; and
if you participate in the AWS Marketplace or Amazon Partner Network (or other similar venues operated or provided by us), your account, your status, subscriptions, and other information.
Customers can access the information above through AWS Offerings, such as the
AWS Management Console
(including the
My Account
,
Billing Dashboard
,
Bills
,
Payment Methods
,
Payment History
,
Preferences
and
Tax Settings
pages), the
AWS Email Preference Center
,
AWS Marketplace
, and
APN Partner Central
.
AWS support for Internet Explorer ends on 07/31/2022. Supported browsers are Chrome, Firefox, Edge, and Safari.
Learn more »
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Sub-policy 2
https://azure.microsoft.com/en-us/explore/trusted-cloud/privacy#:~:text=We%20do%20not%20share%20your,the%20services%20you%20have%20chosen:
Trace Id is missing
Privacy in Azure
When you use Azure services, you are entrusting us with one of your most valuable assets—your data. You trust that the privacy and confidentiality of the data you store and process in Azure services will be protected and that it will be used only in a way that is consistent with your expectations.
Start free
See documentation
You control your data
With Azure, you are the owner of the data that you provide for storing and hosting in Azure services. We do not share your data with advertiser-supported services, nor do we mine it for any purposes like marketing research or advertising.
We process your data only with your agreement, and when we have your agreement, we use your data to provide only the services you have chosen. These agreements apply equally to subcontractors (or, subprocessors) that Microsoft authorizes and hires to perform work that may require access to your data: they can perform only the functions that Microsoft has hired them to provide, and they are bound by the same contractual privacy commitments that Microsoft makes to you.
If you leave the Azure service or your subscription expires, Microsoft follows strict standards for removing data from its systems.
Learn more about data protection in the Microsoft Trust Center
Video container
Play
You choose where your data is located
When you use Azure, you choose where your data is located. Through our large and ever-expanding network of datacenters around the globe, Microsoft offers data residency Azure allows you to choose from more than 60 regions linked by one of the largest interconnected networks on the planet, including more than 150 datacenters and growing.
However, no matter where your data is stored, Microsoft does not control or limit the locations from which you or your end users may access, copy, or move customer data. Most Azure services enable you to specify the region where your customer data will be stored and processed.
Azure offers tools to help you control the location of your data—for example, you can use
Azure Policy
or
Azure Blueprint
to restrict access to selected regions for your subscription.
Data residency in Azure
Azure secures your data at rest and in transit
With state-of-the-art encryption, Azure protects your data both at rest and in transit. Azure secures your data using various encryption methods, protocols, and algorithms, including
double encryption
.
For data at rest, all data written to the Azure storage platform is encrypted through 256-bit AES encryption and is FIPS 140-2 compliant. Proper key management is essential. By default, Microsoft-managed keys protect your data, and Azure Key Vault helps ensure that encryption keys are properly secured. Azure key management also includes server-side encryption that uses service-managed keys, customer-managed keys in Azure Key Vault, or customer-managed keys on customer-controlled hardware. With client-side encryption, you can manage and store keys on-premises or in another secure location.
For data in transit—data moving between user devices and Microsoft datacenters or within and between the datacenters themselves—Microsoft adheres to IEEE 802.1AE MAC Security Standards, and uses and enables your use of industry-standard encrypted transport protocols, such as Transport Layer Security (TLS) and Internet Protocol Security (IPsec).
Azure Data Encryption
Microsoft defends your data
Through clearly defined and well-established response policies and processes, strong contractual commitments, and if need be, the courts, Microsoft defends your data. We believe that all government requests for your data should be directed to you. We do not give any government direct or unfettered access to customer data. Microsoft is principled and transparent about how we respond to requests for data.
Because we believe that you have control over your own data, we will not disclose data to a government except as you direct or where required by law. Microsoft scrutinizes all government demands to ensure they are legally valid and appropriate.
If Microsoft receives a demand for a customer's data, we will direct the requesting party to seek the data directly from the customer. If compelled to disclose or give access to any customer's data, Microsoft will promptly notify the customer and provide a copy of the demand unless legally prohibited from doing so.
Law Enforcement Requests Report
Azure adheres to privacy standards
Get details on how Azure also complies with many external privacy standards, laws, and regulations, including: the
GDPR
,
ISO/IEC 27701
,
ISO/IEC 27018
,
EU Standard Contractual Clauses
,
HIPAA
,
HITRUST
,
FERPA
,
Japan My Number Act
,
Canada PIPEDA
,
Spain LOPD
, and
Argentina PDPA
.
Microsoft Online Services Terms and Data Protection Addendum
Read our standard contractual language for data processing in the
Microsoft Online Services Terms
(OST).
Read the Online Services
Data Protection Addendum
(DPA), and addendum to the OST.
GDPR
Get help fulfilling your General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) obligations with documentation specific to Azure, including:
Checklists
Data subject requests
Breach notification
Data protection impact assessments
Resources
Protecting data privacy using Microsoft Azure (white paper)
Enabling data residency and data protection (white paper)
Security, Privacy, and Compliance in Microsoft Azure white paper
Microsoft Online Services Privacy Statement
Microsoft Trust Center
Sign up
Get 12 months of popular products free—and a $200 credit.
Create your free account
Learn
Start using Azure right away with these tutorials and videos.
Get started
Build
Explore popular services and start building your solution.
Explore documentation
AI-powered assistant
Created with Copilot Studio
Can we help you?
Chat now
No thanks
AI-powered assistant is available 24x7.
Sub-policy 3
https://www.veriff.com/privacy-notice:
Veriff's Privacy Notice
1. Our Privacy Notice in a nutshell
2. Definitions
3. Our main privacy principles
4. The content of Personal Data we process
5. Legal grounds and Purposes of processing
6. Technological aspects of our Service provision and development
7. Data Subject’s rights in relation to Personal Data
8. Disclosure and transfer of Personal Data
9. Security of Personal Data
10. Retention of Personal Data
11. Children’s Personal Data
12. Jurisdiction specific notices
13. Identity verification with the UKDIATF Certified Identity Verification Solution (Medium Level)
14. Veriff's Demo app and testing Veriff's session flow
15. Contact details and information
16. Availability of and changes to the Privacy Notice
Veriff's Privacy Notice
Thank you for taking the time to familiarize yourself with Veriff’s (Veriff OÜ and Veriff Brazil Ltda., hereinafter “
Veriff
”, “
we
”, “
us
”, “
our
”) privacy notice (the “
Privacy Notice
”) which describes how we collect, use, and disclose information about you. This Privacy Notice applies to information we collect from Data Subjects when you access or use our Services or otherwise interact with us, such as by using our demo app, or visiting our Website or offices.
Please note that Veriff’s employees and job applicants are not included in the Data Subject definition of this Privacy Notice, as relevant processing activities are mainly covered by other policies. If you are interested in the data processing activities during our recruitment process, please review our
Recruitment Privacy Notice
.
Veriff is specialized in providing online identification services. We consider ourselves the new standard in identity verification, and when you engage with our Customer, we allow our Customers to verify your identity document e.g. driver’s license, passport or ID card. We mainly process End-User Personal Data as a Data Processor for the benefit of the Customer in order to provide our Services to our Customers. Therefore, you should always read both this Privacy Notice and the information about data processing according to the Customer’s privacy notice (i.e., the privacy notice of the company for whom you identify yourself).
If Veriff is acting as a controller of your personal data (specific activities described in this Privacy Notice), either Veriff OÜ or Veriff Brazil Ltda. will act as the data controller, depending on the entity you are communicating and/or contracting with.
1. Our Privacy Notice in a nutshell
Here is information on this Privacy Notice in a nutshell.
1.1 In this Privacy Notice, we explain how and on what basis we collect, store and process Personal Data of Data Subjects. We also explain what Data Subjects’ rights are and our obligations and liabilities.
1.2
Except as otherwise described in this Privacy Notice, Veriff processes End-Users’ information as directed by our Customers for the provision of our Services. Our Customers who are the Data Controllers of End-User Personal Data determine the purpose of processing End-User Personal Data and, accordingly, Veriff is a Data Processor of End-User Personal Data with respect to those Services. Veriff is always a Data Controller for Personal Data of other Data Subjects, such as Visitors and Office Visitors. For End-Users to fully understand how Personal Data is processed in connection with the Service, End-Users should review both privacy notices, i.e., this Privacy Notice shared with the End-Users by Veriff and the privacy notices of those Customers’, whose services the End-Users are getting verified for.
1.3
You can find jurisdiction specific notices below in
section 12
, such as Additional Information for Individuals residing in certain U.S. States (see section 12.1) and Notice to Individuals Who are Residents of the State of Illinois and the State of Texas (see section 12.2).
1.4
For information about verifying your identity by the Customer using the UKDIATF Certified Identity Verification Solution (Medium Level), please see section 13.
1.5
Please review this Privacy Notice carefully and contact us if you have any comments, questions or concerns. You can reach our Data Protection Officer (DPO) via email at
privacy@veriff.com
or by
submitting a form
.
2. Definitions
Here you can find the meanings of the most important terms in this Privacy Notice to help you understand how and for what we are processing your Personal Data.
Agreement
– the service agreement entered into between Veriff and Customers, including service agreements for trials and partnership agreements.
Customer
– the legal entity to whom we intend to provide or already provide our Services under the Agreement, including Veriff’s partners under a partnership agreement.
Customer Representative
– natural person representing the Customer, including any natural person with whom we communicate (i) as the representative of a potential Customer prior to conclusion of the Agreement, (ii) during the Agreement term as the representative of our Customer, and (iii) after the Agreement term as a representative of former Customer, as relevant.
Data Controller
– a legal person, public authority, agency or other body which, alone or jointly with others, determines the purposes and means of the processing of Personal Data. Except as otherwise provided in this Privacy Notice, Customers are Data Controllers for End-User Personal Data and give instructions regarding processing to Veriff.
Data Processor
– a legal person, public authority, agency, or other body which processes personal data on behalf of a Data Controller. Except as otherwise provided in this Privacy Notice, Veriff processes End-User Personal Data as a Data Processor on behalf of Customers who are the Data Controllers. For all other Data Subjects, Veriff is acting as the Data Controller.
Data Providers
– these are entities, such as public authorities or our Data Processors, from whom we may collect Personal Data for verification purposes. For example, we may check the End-User-provided information against the official public registry or other fraud prevention services.
Data Subject / you
– a natural person or individual about whom we have Personal Data, including Customer Representatives, End-Users, Visitors, Office Visitors, natural persons who provide us feedback (including research and inquiry-related data) and other natural persons whose Personal Data we may process.
Demo app
– the app owned by Veriff, which can be downloaded in App Store or Google Play, which allows you to test Veriff’s verification flows as a Data Subject.
EEA
– European Economic Area (the European Union Member States, Norway, Iceland and Liechtenstein).
End-User
– the natural person regarding whom we collect Personal Data from via the Service at the request of the Customer or any other natural person accessing or using the Service.
Office Visitor
– is any person visiting the office premises of Veriff.
Personal Data or Personal Information
– any information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person (the Data Subject), subject to applicable data protection laws; an identifiable natural person is one who can be identified, directly or indirectly, in particular by reference to an identifier such as a name, an identification number, location data, an online identifier or to one or more factors specific to the physical, physiological, genetic, mental, economic, cultural or social identity of that natural person. Anonymized data is de-identified and not Personal Data.
Politically exposed person (PEP)
– politically exposed person including their family members and close associates in accordance with the applicable legal acts regards to prevention of money laundering or terrorist financing (such as a natural person who is or who has been entrusted with prominent public functions, e.g. member of parliament or of a similar legislative body, a member of a governing body of a political party, a member of a supreme court).
Privacy Notice
– this privacy notice, made available at
https://www.veriff.com/privacy-notice
.
Service(s)
– personal identity verification service and connected services (such as any ongoing authentication services, assisting services, fraud prevention and other similar services) provided by us to Customers.
Visitor
– is any person visiting Veriff’s Website.
Website or Veriff’s Website
–
https://www.veriff.com/
, including its subpages and subdomains, operated by Veriff.
3. Our main privacy principles
Here you can find the privacy principles we follow when processing Personal Data.
We follow what we call the “Fundamental Six”, that is, six principles regarding Veriff’s data processing activities:
(1) First, we strive to process Personal Data in a
reliable and confidential way
. Each person’s right to the protection of their Personal Data is important to us and we shall do our best to ensure that Personal Data collected by us is adequately protected. We will do our best efforts to regularly evaluate the risks associated with the processing of Personal Data and apply appropriate mitigation strategies to hedge risks.
(2) Second,
data protection is an integral part of our Service
. We care about developing and deploying services that take into account privacy by design and privacy by default principles. Compliance with our Privacy Notice is integrated into our day-to-day activities, services and processes, and our development efforts. We understand that compliance with data protection rules takes place through our employees. Therefore, we consider it important and we seek to ensure that our employees know and comply with the requirements thereof. We expect, instruct and train our employees to respect our privacy requirements.
(3) Third,
we process Personal Data lawfully and purposefully
. We set clear goals for the processing of Personal Data and process Personal Data for these purposes only. We refrain from collecting or processing the data that we do not need. Veriff aims to delete/blur or make in other ways unreadable any data or documents presented in the session that are not necessary for Veriff’s service provision. This also means all transfers of Personal Data must have a valid legal basis.
(4) Fourth,
we process Personal Data in a transparent and fair way
. We strive for an appropriate, secure, honest and lawful manner of processing the Personal Data to prevent the unauthorized disclosure or inappropriate use of Personal Data. We also work to eliminate the possibility of discrimination or bias in our Service.
(5) Fifth,
we store Personal Data only for as long as the retention of data is required
by law, a contract or is necessary for the provision or development of our Services or required for protecting us against legal claims. At the end of the retention period, we shall permanently erase the Personal Data or anonymize it.
(6) Sixth,
we do our best to make sure that the Personal Data we process is accurate
and limited to what is necessary for the purpose for which it was collected.
4. The content of Personal Data we process
Here you can find what Personal Data we process about End-Users, Customer Representatives, Visitors and Office Visitors.
Personal Data we process about End-Users
4.1. We provide personal identity verification services to Customers.
This means we verify End-Users, i.e., you. For that you have acknowledged data processing according to the Customer’s privacy notice and data processing by us in accordance with this Privacy Notice. We may collect and process, among other data, the following Personal Data collected either directly from you or from the Customer:
(1) personal information concerning the End-User, which mainly consists of information on the End-User’s document and/or extracted from the document, for example name, sex, personal identification number or national equivalent, date of birth, estimated age, legal capacity, nationality, citizenship, organ donor status, eye color, weight and height, as well as the historic data of that End-User that may have been stored with us during previous interactions within the retention periods;
(2) document details, such as the name of the document, issuing country, number, expiration date, information embedded to document barcodes (may vary depending on the document) and security features;
(3) identity verification data, such as photographs taken from you and your document, and video and sound recording of the verification process (of the whole session, if such recording is enabled by the Customer), and the checks results;
(4) contact details, such as address, e-mail address, telephone numbers, IP address and, if relevant, presented document type (e.g. utility bill);
(5) technical data (
Device Signature
), including but not limited to information about the date, time and your activity in the Services, your IP address and domain name, your software and hardware attributes as well as your general geographic location (
e.g.
city, state, country);
(6) machine-readable data, metadata and device and network information;
(7) photos and videos as well as data, such as face scans and other measurements, extracted from the same which are used to authenticate the End-User or compare the End-User’s face to identity document photos - some of this extracted data may be considered biometric data and/or sensitive Personal Data (also "special category of personal data", hereinafter referred to as “sensitive Personal Data”) under applicable data protection laws in certain jurisdictions;
(8) publicly available relevant data and data from external registries, e.g. information about being a politically exposed person (PEP), checks in public sanction lists and other information from such registries, as determined by the Customer;
(9) personal information provided by the End-User, e.g. data from communications with us, feedback data;
(10) personal information provided by natural persons who have participated in our product and market research initiatives;
(11) personal information that we have received from the Customer, e.g. contact details;
(12) evidence and records of legal basis (including consents), for example in cases where we are required or have elected to obtain a consent or a written release or another legal basis prior to processing certain Personal Data.
4.2 We also offer ongoing authentication services to our Customers.
This means that we may use the above mentioned data, but in particular the End-User’s photos and videos as well as data extracted from the same, such as face scans and other measurements, and other documents to verify End-User’s identity on an ongoing basis, for example, to grant the End-User access to our Customer’s services, among other authentication use-cases as determined by our Customer. Such extracted data may be biometric data and/or sensitive Personal Data under applicable data protection laws in certain jurisdictions. We only use such extracted data for the provision of the Service and related business purposes, such as maintaining, improving, upgrading or enhancing the Service. We do not use such extracted data for the purpose of inferring characteristics about you for any other reasons.
4.3 How we obtain End-User’s Personal Data.
We provide our Services to Customers and collect your data from the Customer and/or as you go through the Service flow. This means our Customers are responsible for disclosing to you their privacy notice and any information about the collection of your Personal Data by us on their behalf. Based on an authorization we receive from the Customer, we also collect your Personal Data independently from Data Providers, e.g. to offer our Services within a trust-based relationship and to prevent fraud. For example, if we need to verify the validity of your
identification document
, we may inquire for additional information from the appropriate registry or from other fraud prevention services at the direction of the Customer. For fraud prevention and detection purposes, subject to applicable laws, we may also collect information about compromised identities, for example images or device or network information which have been leaked or used to commit repetitive fraud via Veriff’s service (see
list of Data Providers
).
4.4
Customers may have access to your Personal Data. We may share your Personal Data including identity verification data with the Customer through which you used our identity verification service.
4.5
Please note that providing your Personal Data is voluntary. However, the decision not to do so may mean that you are not able to verify your identity via our Service.
Personal Data we process about the Customer Representatives
4.6 We need to process Customer Representative data
to engage new Customers, enter into the Agreement, to provide our Service, to communicate with the representative of our Customer and for other lawful reasons. This means we may process, among other information, the following data of the Customer Representative:
(1) information of the representative, such as name, job title, position, and contact information;
(2) information in connection with provision of the Service, such as data from communication with us;
(3) data from Customer Representative calls, such as video, image and sound recordings;
(4) technical data (
Device Signature
), including but not limited to information about the date, time and your activity in the Services, your IP address and domain name, and your software and hardware attributes as well as your general geographic location (
e.g.
city, country);
(5) publicly available relevant data;
(6) if the Customer is subject to Veriff’s KYB procedure, identity verification data of Customer Representative, including the data categories listed in Section 4.1 of this Privacy Notice.
4.7 How we obtain Customer Representative’s Personal Data.
We collect this data either from you directly when you communicate with us directly, e.g. by sending us an email, providing us with your Personal Data on the phone or through our customer support tools. The identity verification data is collected when the Customer Representative completes the identity verification step as may be required before granting full access to the Service to the Customer. We may also collect some of your Personal Data in the course of provision of the Service to your employer. We collect information about the Customer (including about relevant representatives of the Customer) from publicly available sources. We only gather relevant and necessary data in order to validate the right of representation e.g. this may include verification of your identity, processing of your Personal Data for introducing the Service (demo) etc.
4.8
Please note, the provision of Personal Data is voluntary. However, if you do not provide your Personal Data, the Customer may not be able to make use of the full range of our Services.
Other Personal Data we process about Visitors, Customer Representatives with an account on our Website and/or End-Users of our Service
4.9
When you visit our Website and/or Service, we may use cookies and similar technologies (collectively “Cookies”), including those provided by third parties, to collect information about your use of our Website and/or Service and other websites and mobile apps, including:
(1) your IP address, and time, and approximate location inferred from your IP address;
(2) usage of the Website and/or Service and other web log data, such as the pages you visit on the Website, the date and time of your visit, the files that you download and the URLs from the websites you visit before and after navigating to the Website;
(3) technical data (
Device Signature
), including but not limited to information about your IP address and domain name, your software and hardware attributes (including device IDs) and your general geographic location (e.g. city, country);
(4) e-mail addresses, when you subscribe to Veriff’s newsletters or download Veriff’s content.
4.10 Purpose of processing with the help of Cookies and related activities.
We use the data collected from Visitors, including through Cookies, to improve our Service and make use of our Service more convenient. For example, Cookies help to enable Website and Service features, to analyze and track Website usage and activity, including for quality assurance and to determine the popularity of certain content, and to personalize your experience, such as by remembering your customized choices. We also use Cookies for our marketing efforts, including to ensure we deliver to you the most relevant content, to deliver advertising targeted to you on other companies’ sites and mobile apps, understand the effectiveness of this advertising, and to make our marketing efforts more efficient subject to applicable laws. For Visitors outside the U.S., read our
Cookie Notice
for more details regarding your controls with respect to Cookies. For Visitors inside the U.S., depending on where you reside, you can adjust certain cookie settings on our
“Your Privacy Choices” page
(see section 7.4(10) for more information).
In addition to ad targeting activities that rely on cookies and similar technologies, we work with advertising partners to translate other identifiers, such as your email address or phone number, into a unique identifier (called a hashed value) that such partners can then use to show ads that promote Veriff that are more relevant to you across the web and in mobile apps. Depending on where you reside, you may have the right to opt out of these disclosures by filling out the form included within our
“Your Privacy Choices” page
(see section 7.4(10) for more information).
Personal Data we process related to responsible disclosure
.
4.11
If you decide to contact Veriff related to reporting an issue mentioned in our
Responsible Disclosure Policy
, we only process the following Personal Data about you:
(1) name;
(2) e-mail address;
(3) picture, if you consent to disclosing it in our
Hall of Fame
.
Personal Data we process related to the Demo app and testing Veriff’s session flow.
4.12
If you decide to download and use Veriff’s Demo app or test Veriff’s session flow on our Website, we may record identity verification data (see section 4.1(3)) and technical data (see section 4.1(5)).
Personal Data we process related to our Office Visitors.
4.13
If you visit the office premises and workplaces of Veriff, this means we may process, among other information, the following Personal Data about you:
(1) name;
(2) e-mail address;
(3) photo;
(4) visuals captured via video surveillance equipment;
(5) if you use Veriff’s office WiFi network, then the source IP addresses and ports, destination addresses and ports, source MAC addresses;
(6) during the widespread of infectious diseases (e.g., COVID-19), subject to applicable laws, proof of vaccination, valid negative test result, recovery certificate or other relevant data to ensure a safe visit.
5. Legal grounds and Purposes of processing
Here you may read why and on what grounds we process your Personal Data.
5.1 We process Personal Data for the provision of our Services.
Regarding Personal Data about End-Users, Veriff's main purpose for processing is to provide our Services to our Customers.
(1) Generally, the main purpose of the Service is to verify your identity, and for this purpose we capture photos and video (if applicable) of the verification session as well as data extracted from the same, such as face scans and other measurements (such extracted data may be biometric data and/or sensitive Personal Data in certain jurisdictions), and the document(s) provided for verification. In addition, for verification, we conduct fraud prevention and detection checks that are an integral part of our Service. Identification process results with information about the completed checks are categorized as “Approved”, “Resubmission needed” or “Declined”.
(2) In some cases, we may also further check whether we have previously verified an End-User on behalf of the same or a different Customer by comparing the session with the previous session. This helps our Customers not only to verify identities but further protects them and their End-Users by helping them understand when an End-User may be generating multiple identities, tampering documents or manipulating device or network information. To do all of this, we closely examine the information provided by the End-User, including machine-readable data, metadata and device and network information.
(3) We mainly process End-User Personal Data as a Data Processor for the benefit of the Customer in order to fulfill the Agreement entered into with the Customer for (i) performance of the Agreement (including for the provision of the Service, and performance of any obligations or realization of any rights arising from the Agreement; (ii) the purpose of realization of rights and fulfillment of obligations deriving from legal acts; and (iii) processing your inquiries and requests.
(4) The legal basis for the processing depends on the Customer as the use cases and related legal requirements vary from Customer to Customer. The legal basis is selected and ensured by the Customer. In some cases we or our Customer may ask you to grant us
consent for processing
. Veriff may, as determined and as appropriate, choose to collect the consent itself, however, the relationship between the End-User and the Customer remains unaffected for such collection of consent by Veriff. Please note that we cannot provide the Service in respect of an anonymous End-User, and therefore the use of our Service is subject to the disclosure of Personal Data to us and allowing the processing of Personal Data by the Customer and us. However, giving consent is voluntary, but failure to do so may mean that we may not be able to provide the Service. For example, we will not be able to verify your identity. If you have granted the Customer and/or us a consent to process Personal Data, the details of such processes and purposes thereof will be outlined in the consent itself.
(5) To the extent permitted by law and the Agreement, Veriff may also use Personal Data for other reasonably necessary operational purposes as part of provision of the Service, or rely on its legitimate interest for such processing as described in the next section.
5.2 We also may process Personal Data of Data Subjects, including End-Users, as a Controller if processing is necessary in our legitimate interests in compliance with applicable data protection laws
, meaning our interest in the management and direction of our business in order to be able to offer the best possible services on the market. Pursuant to our “Fundamental Six” principles for data processing, we only process Personal Data on this legal basis (legitimate interest) after careful assessment in order to ascertain that the legitimate interest is in compliance with the interests and rights of a Data Subject (after carrying out the so-called three-step test) and to the extent it is permitted by law and the Agreement, as applicable. For our legitimate interest, we may process data for the following purposes:
(1) for analyzing the use of our Service, and using research and analysis results, among other methods, for carrying out satisfaction surveys, feedback questionnaires and developing our products and services, including development of autonomous and automated decision-making processes;
(2) for sending out newsletters, for marketing and developing and promoting our Services, for organization of campaigns, including personalized and targeted campaigns, and measuring the effectiveness of the performed marketing activities, as noted above, we will only rely on our legitimate interest to the extent this is permitted by law and the Agreement. Please note that for sending out newsletters, we only process your contact details;
(3) for ensuring a trust-based relationship with Customers and End-Users, this includes for example, identity verification of Customer Representative, determining the ultimate beneficiaries and PEP status, as well as other activities necessary to prevent fraud, including checks in public sanction lists or our own Service history;
(4) for administration and analysis of the Customer base to improve the availability, selection and quality of Services and products, and to make our Services more personalized and the best possible;
(5) for building and managing our Customer relationships;
(6) for analysis of identifiers and Personal Data collected upon the visit of websites, mobile applications and other Services. We may use the collected data for web analysis or for the analysis of mobile and information society services, for ensuring and improving functioning, for statistical purposes and for analyzing Visitor and Customer Representative behavior, and for improving the experience of Visitors and Customer Representatives and for providing better and more personalized Services;
(7) for monitoring the Services. We may record the messages and instructions given on our premises or by means of communication (e-mail, telephone, etc.), as well as information and other operations carried out by us, and shall use those recordings as needed to evidence instructions or other operations;
(8) for network, information and cyber security considerations, for example, for fighting against piracy and for ensuring the security of the Websites and Service, as well as for the measures taken for making and storing backup copies;
(9) for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims; and ensuring compliance with applicable regulations, including retaining proof of evidence of such for compliance with our legal obligations;
(10) for conducting product and market research for purposes of quality assurance, product improvements, developments and assessing market fit, this includes contacting and communication, interviews, making conclusions, recording of such communications for a limited period of time, etc. with End-Users, Customer Representatives and other relevant data subjects. This includes creating anonymized data or anonymized or aggregated overviews and summaries of the aforementioned. Please note that Veriff processes, maintains, and uses aggregated or de-identified information only in a de-identified fashion and will not attempt to re-identify such information, except as permitted by law;
(11) for satisfying our legal obligations with respect to the processing and retention of Personal Data, including for obtaining the relevant legal basis for processing certain Personal Data concerning certain End-Users. Obtaining and maintaining records that such legal basis has been obtained by us is important for us to be able to prove that we comply and adhere to our legal obligations outside of and in the European Union;
(12) for fraud prevention and detection purposes, to identify signs of fraud based on our internal fraud framework and advanced fraud prevention and detection techniques and to conduct certain checks against third party sites, e.g., checks against authority databases;
(13) for developing, testing, improving and altering the functionality of the Service, including for machine learning (as specified in section 6 below), data annotation, testing and training, and producing anonymized or anonymized and aggregated statistical reports and research. This may include anonymizing Personal Data;
(14) for reasons of substantial public interest on the basis of law, including but not limited to activities relating to fraud prevention and non-discrimination (e.g., bias mitigation).
5.3 We may ask you to give us your consent for processing.
Veriff can process your Personal Data if you have given consent to the processing of your Personal Data for one or more specific purposes. Please note that giving consent is voluntary and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. For example, you can ask us to stop using your personal data for direct marketing purposes by using the unsubscribe function at the end of the marketing email. However, we remind you that the withdrawal of consent does not affect the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. These are some of the cases where Veriff processes your data based on your consent.
(1) Your consent is the legal basis for processing Personal Data when you share your
findings related to responsible disclosure
. Publishing your name and/or picture on our website is only done under your written consent (
read more
about our bug bounty program and responsible disclosures
)
.
(2) Based on your consent, we may use your Personal Data to send you
marketing
information about our Service which you have requested from us. Including, if you have submitted a request and/or filled out a relevant form on the Website.
(3) Veriff asks Customer Representative's consent before recording audio and video of the
Customer Representative call
. The recording is used solely for Veriff's analytical purposes and improvement of Veriff's Services and processes. However, please note that the processing may not be based on your consent and the withdrawal of your consent may not be applicable in case of recording different communications (including video) for product and market research (see as described in p 5.2(10)).
(4) Veriff asks for Customer Representative’s consent to process some data for Customer Representative’s identity verification, such as the data described in Section 4.1(7) of this Privacy Notice. In case you as the Customer Representative want to withdraw your consent or need assistance with alternative identity verification options, please submit your request to support@veriff.com.
(5) Veriff asks for your consent before you use Veriff’s
demo app or test Veriff's session flow on our website
. This is for the purpose of testing Veriff’s verification flow. More information about Veriff’s Demo app can be found in section 14.
(6) We may use your consent as the basis for the processing of personal data also in other cases. The purpose is then specified at the time of the collection of the consent.
5.4 Processing related to Office Visitors.
When you visit the office premises and workplaces, we process your Personal Data if processing is necessary in our legitimate interests. For example, our legitimate interest in detecting and preventing harmful or unlawful actions, ensuring safety of Veriff’s property, confidential information and employees and establishing, exercising or defending of legal claims we may process Personal Data for the following purposes:
(1) registering your visit to the office;
(2) conducting regular video surveillance in the marked areas;
(3) monitoring the use of Veriff's office WiFi network and logging the traffic in the network. Such data is processed if you connect any of your devices to Veriff's office WiFi network during your visit;
(4) ensuring the health and safety during emergency situations such as in case of widespread infectious diseases subject to applicable laws
. During the spread of infectious diseases (e.g., COVID-19), for the purpose of ensuring adequate protection of the health and safety of Veriff’s employees in the workplace, you may be required to provide proof of vaccination, valid negative test result, recovery certificate or other relevant data. In case you have no proof to provide, or you present medical contraindication to vaccination as proof, you will be offered on-site rapid testing, if available. Health related data contained in the presented information may be sensitive Personal Data. Before presenting any such Personal Data you are asked to provide us with explicit consent to visually assess your admissibility to the office premises and workplaces. In any case, no information presented to Veriff is retained, meaning that no Personal Data will be accessible to Veriff after the moment you present the information. Please note that giving consent is voluntary and you have the opportunity to withdraw your consent at any time, however if you refuse to provide the proof, conduct the rapid testing or if the rapid test result is positive, you must leave the office immediately.
5.5 Processing for a new purpose.
When Personal Data processing is carried out for a new purpose different from those for which the Personal Data was originally collected or is not based on the consent given by the Data Subject, we shall carefully assess the permissibility of such new processing under applicable laws. In order to determine whether the processing for the new purpose follows the purpose for which the Personal Data was originally collected, Veriff shall take into consideration, inter alia, the following:
(1) any link between the old and new purposes for which the Personal Data was collected and the intended further purposes of processing;
(2) the context of collecting the Personal Data, in particular regarding the relationship between the Data Subject and us;
(3) the nature of the Personal Data, in particular whether sensitive Personal Data are processed;
(4) possible consequences of the intended further processing for the Data Subjects;
(5) existence of appropriate protection measures which may consist in, for example, encryption, pseudonymization and anonymization.
6. Technological aspects of our Service provision and development
To verify your identity in a secure and less error-prone way, we use automatic algorithms and machine learning for our Service. Read about it in this section.
6.1 Machine learning means the use and development of computer systems
that are able to learn and adapt without following explicit instructions, by using algorithms and statistical models to analyze and draw inferences from patterns in data. Using machine learning helps us to recognize specific patterns in information and make predictions about new sets of information based on those patterns. The main aim of teaching our models is to have more precise (i.e. accurate, less error-prone) and safe models that also avoid bias. All models are constantly reviewed by the model itself and by humans, and adjustments for more precise and error-free results are made, as necessary. As a result of such machine learning processes Veriff's Service improves.
6.2
It is important that algorithms are built, trained and tested on training sets, which consist of real data (see description of data categories above in Section 4.1) or anonymized data. All machine learning models are highly dependent on the quality of input data. Such processing is only done for internal use to improve and develop our Services and done only based on the contractual mandate received from our Customers under the precondition that a valid legal basis has been obtained.
6.3
Veriff stands for the concept that machine learning is conducted in an ethical and trustworthy way that respects human rights and freedoms. Machine learning as a tool will enable End-Users to receive better, more secure and faster services provided by Veriff's Customers and help to prevent and detect fraud. Datasets used to develop, test and train are kept in separate, monitored and highly secure data research environments.
6.4 Veriff uses a verification engine trained with machine learning to provide Services to our Customers
. The verification process is either automated, semi-automated or done by a human:
(1)
Semi-automated verification process
. This means that a human will be involved if the automated verification algorithm (the Verification Engine) is not able to reach a decision on its own. Simply put the verification engine checks the input data against the predetermined decision profile and based on that reaches a decision. The Verification Engine is constantly learning to correctly classify and match information, detect identity fraud or theft, and to verify identity, however the assistance of a human could be needed if the picture is blurry, confidence of the quality of extracted information is low or the Verification Engine runs into some other difficulty in analyzing the verification session.
(2)
Fully automated verification process.
This means that the Verification Engine verifies your identity without human involvement. When performing a fully automated verification process, our Customer informs you of the automated processing and may ask your explicit consent to do this. However, in some cases, where the Customer has other legal grounds for such processing e.g. obligations under applicable law – consent may not be needed. You have the right to ask for information and an explanation regarding the logic behind the decision the Verification Engine has made; at any time, you will have the right to request human intervention or object to the decision made on grounds relating to your particular situation.
(3) We may have different solutions for processing with different Customers, e.g. in some cases the verification session will
only be analyzed by a human
.
6.5
We would like to point out that the decision on whether the Customer provides its service to the End-User is made by the Customer. Meaning, even if the verification flow has been fully automated, the verification result will be taken into account by the Customer for the decision on whether to provide its service or not. The verification results itself - “Approved”, “Resubmission needed” or “Declined” - are not determinative for whether the Customer’s service is provided to the End-User.
6.6 Machine learning is also the driving engine for Veriff's innovation
when improving our Services, testing new features and ensuring quality Services. For further improvement of our Services, Service performance and features testing (A/B tests) is used to analyze the End-User experience and response regarding changes to the structure, text or any other feature of Veriff's Service.
6.7
Fraud prevention and detection is a vital part of Veriff’s Service. Detection of activities matching a certain pattern may lead to profile generation, in particular for fraud prevention and detection purposes. In compliance with the instructions received from the Customer, Veriff may analyze and compare the data points available in relation to the End-User as part of the Service. For example, Veriff may compare if session media matches each other and if technical data indicates associations with previously occurred suspicious sessions. Such processing activity may be deemed as generating a profile of the End-User. Results of such analysis are displayed to the Customer.
7. Data Subject’s rights in relation to Personal Data
Read about your data protection rights.
7.1
Depending on where you reside, you may have the right to (1) request to know more about and access your personal information, (2) request deletion of your personal information, (3) request correction of inaccurate personal information; (4) object to certain processing, (5) withdraw your consent where we process your information on that basis, and (6) request we restrict certain processing. More detailed information about each right is provided below.
7.2
If you wish to exercise any of
your rights regarding Personal Data
or ask questions about the Privacy Notice, please submit a corresponding request to us at
privacy@veriff.com
or via
this form
. We will respond to your request by email as a rule no later than within one month or sooner if required by applicable law.
7.3
Please note that before we can provide you with the requested information regarding your Personal Data, we may need to verify your identity such as by asking you to provide information related to your recent interactions with us, your relationship to us, your session information, or account registration information. Please also note that if your request concerns data we have processed as a Data Processor (i.e. in the course of Service provision), you must submit your request to the Customer who is the Data Controller. The Data Controller can fulfill your request, as relevant. We will inform you if this is the case.
7.4
Depending on where you reside, you as a Data Subject may have the following rights in relation to your Personal Data:
(1)
The right to know:
The right to get confirmation whether we are processing Personal Data about you and to obtain certain personalized details about the Personal Data we have collected about you, including:
the categories of Personal Data collected;
the categories of sources of the Personal Data;
the purposes for which the Personal Data were collected;
the categories of Personal Data disclosed to third parties (if any), and the categories of recipients to whom the Personal Data were disclosed;
information about automated decision-making (if any);
the categories of Personal Data shared for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes (if any), and the categories of recipients to whom the Personal Data were disclosed for those purposes; and
the categories of Personal Data sold (if any), and the categories of third parties to whom the Personal Data were sold. Please note that as stated in section 7.4(10) below, we generally do not sell your data that we collect in the course of providing identity verification services nor share it for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes.
(2)
The right to access & portability:
The right to obtain access to the Personal Data we have collected about you and the right to obtain a copy of the Personal Data in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format that allows you to transmit the data to another entity without hindrance.
(3)
The right to correction:
The right to correct inaccuracies in your personal data, taking into account the nature of the personal data and the purposes of the processing of the personal data.
(4)
The right to deletion:
The right to have us delete the personal data we maintain about you.
(5)
The right to non-discrimination:
The right to not receive retaliatory or discriminatory treatment in connection with a request to exercise the above rights. However, please note that if you exercise these rights it limits our ability to process Personal Data, we may no longer be able to engage with you in the same manner.
(6)
The right to withdraw the consent:
The right to take back the consent you have given to us for the processing of Personal Data. Please note that withdrawal of your consent shall not affect the legality of the processing that was made on the basis of consent before the withdrawal.
(7)
The right to object:
The Right to file an objection if your Personal Data processing takes place on the basis of our legitimate interest or public interest.
(8)
The right to restriction of processing:
The right which in certain cases allows you to direct us to limit the processing of your Personal Data for a certain period of time (e.g., if you have filed an objection to Personal Data processing).
(9)
The right to submit a complaint and make appeals:
If you find that applicable data protection laws have not been complied with, we would appreciate it if you contact us at
privacy@veriff.com
(including for any appeals of our decisions). However, you also have the right to complain directly to a data protection authority about our collection, use or other processing of your Personal Data.
For more information, please contact your local data protection authority in the EEA or in the United Kingdom. The Estonian Data Protection Inspectorate is the lead data protection supervisory authority for Veriff (registered office at 39 Tatari St., 10134 Tallinn, phone nr + 372 627 4135, e-mail
info@aki.ee
).
If you are in the United States and have concerns about the results of an appeal, you may contact the attorney general in the state where you reside.
If the processing of your Personal Data is subject to the Brazilian General Data Protection Law (Law No. 13,709/2018, as amended), you can contact our DPO MKR Consultoria Ltda at
dpo@veriff.com
, and you also have the right to file a petition directly to the Brazilian Data Protection Authority (ANPD).
(10)
Opting out of targeted advertising, sharing, and sales.
Our “sale,” “sharing” and “targeted advertising” activities do not apply to personal information that we collect in the course of providing identity verification services to our Customers. In the US, some of the activities described in sections 4.9 and 4.10 above may be considered “sales” or “sharing” of your personal data or use of your data for “targeted advertising” under the law that applies to you. Depending on where you reside, you may opt out of cookie-based ad targeting on our website by clicking the “Opt-out” button from within our
“Your Privacy Choices” page
. Your opt-out choice will be linked to your browser only; therefore, you will need to renew your opt-out choice if you use a new browser or device to access our Websites or Services, or if you clear your cookies. You may also have the right to opt out of disclosures of your email address and other identifiers for the purpose of showing ads that promote Veriff across the web and in mobile apps by filling out the form included within our
“Your Privacy Choices” page
. You can also opt out by visiting our Services with a legally-recognized universal choice signal enabled (such as the Global Privacy Control). If you are not logged into your account with us, our processing of the signal will be limited to cookie-based sales, sharing, and targeted advertising for the specific browser or device that you are using.  For Visitors and Customer Representatives outside the U.S., read our
Cookie Notice
for more details regarding your controls with respect to Cookies.
(11)
Authorized agents.
You may have a right to submit a rights request via an authorized agent. If you are submitting a rights request as an authorized agent, you may be required to submit proof of your authorization to make the request, such as a valid power of attorney or proof that you have signed permission from the individual who is the subject of the request. Please do not provide any sensitive personal information in connection with this request, such as a driver's license or other government-issued ID. In some cases, we may be required to contact the individual who is the subject of the request to verify his or her own identity or confirm you have permission to submit this request. If you are an authorized agent seeking to make a request, please contact us at
privacy@veriff.com
. Any questions or requests regarding Veriff’s processing of End-User Personal Data for the provision of Services to Veriff’s Customer should be directed to that Customer who is acting as the Data Controller for Personal Data about End-Users.
8. Disclosure and transfer of Personal Data
In this section you will find information about possible disclosure and transfer of your Personal Data.
8.1
Disclosure of Personal Data to authorities
. Please note that due to legal requirements, we may be obliged to disclose or grant access to your Personal Data to the authorities and the supervisory authority (e.g. a court or a government agency).
8.2
Disclosure to Data Controllers, Data Processors and authorized recipients
. Unless stated otherwise in this Privacy Notice or noted otherwise to you separately, we may disclose your Personal Data to Data Controllers for whom we are Data Processors (e.g. Customers), to our authorized Data Processors (sub-processors) and authorized third party sites (e.g. external registries), as well as to persons who are legally entitled to receive your Personal Data (e.g., government or law enforcement request). For the Service provision, the authorized Data Processors (sub-processors) with primary locations are listed
here
and authorized third party sites are listed
here
. For example, a End-User’s Personal Data, including biometric data, can be processed by authorized sub-processors that provide identity verification core services to Veriff; Customer Representative’s Personal Data can be shared with our advertising and marketing partners, companies carrying out satisfaction surveys, debt collection agencies, credit registers, authorities and organizations intermediating or providing (electronic) mail, compliance or payment services and the like, Office Visitors Personal Data can be shared with IT and security partners, provided that:
(1) the respective purpose and the processing are lawful;
(2) we have diligently assessed that the authorized Data Processors or sub-processor will comply with the data protection requirements;
(3) the Personal Data processing is carried out in accordance with our guidelines and on the basis of a valid agreement.
(4) If you have questions about our authorized Data Processors or sub-processors, please contact us at
privacy@veriff.com
.
8.3 Please note that End-User’s Personal Data can only be shared with Veriff's sub-processors as well as to persons who are legally entitled to receive your Personal Data, if there is a valid legal basis.
8.4
Transfer of Personal Data
. In the event that we need to carry out an international data transfer, as defined by the applicable data protection laws (e.g. for utilizing the sub-processors’ services and technical infrastructure), the transfer shall be in accordance with the requirements, principles and safeguards as stated in the applicable data protection laws, such as relying on adequacy decisions issued by or standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission (or other relevant authority), or the compliance with applicable data transfer accountability requirements. While such Personal Data is outside of your country or province of residence, it may be subject to the laws of the country, province or state in which it is held, and may be subject to disclosure to the governments, courts or law enforcement or regulatory agencies of such other country, province or state pursuant to the laws of such territory. In cases where Veriff acts as the Data Controller, we make available further information on the safeguards applied (if relevant) or the extent of the transfer of Personal Data upon your request.
9. Security of Personal Data
Security is of utmost importance to us. We do our best to protect Personal Data in our hands.
9.1
We apply various
commercially reasonable measures (physical, technical, organizational)
to protect your Personal Data from unauthorized or arbitrary modifications, disclosure, acquisition, destruction, loss, theft, misuse, alteration or unauthorized access.
9.2
However, please note that electronic transmission or storage of information is not always 100% secure. Therefore, despite the security measures that we have put in place to protect Personal Data about you, we cannot guarantee that loss, misuse, or alteration of data will never occur. If you have any information about an actual or suspected data breach, please inform us immediately at
privacy@veriff.com
. We will deal with the issue immediately and inform our lead data protection supervisory authority (if applicable).
10. Retention of Personal Data
Here you can find our data retention principles that is the length of the period for which we keep Personal Data.
10.1
To determine the appropriate
retention period
, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of the Personal Data and the purposes for which we process it. We must also consider periods for which we may need to retain Personal Data in order to meet our legal obligations or to deal with complaints or queries and to protect our legal rights in the event of claims being made.
10.2
We shall store your Personal Data for as long as necessary to carry out the purposes for which we originally collected it and for other business purposes explained in this Privacy Notice or as long as required by law or in accordance with the law, or for the purposes stated in this Privacy Notice. For example, there is often a statutory retention period for accounting documentation.
10.3
For the Service provision, we store the data of End-Users during the period set forth in the Agreement (we may have different data retention periods agreed upon with the Customer) or as long as it is necessary for possible establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims of End-Users, Customers or ourselves, or for anti-fraud purposes. For more information about the data retention period for the Service, you should read the privacy notice provided to you by the Customer.
10.4
For the purposes listed in section 5.2, we may store your Personal Data for a different period than agreed with Customers in the Agreement if we have a lawful basis to do so, e.g. you have given us consent to use your Personal Data  or we have assessed that we have legal basis to do so for the development of our Services or the data is anonymized.
10.5
Information about the data retention in Veriff’s Demo app and testing Veriff’s session flow can be found in section 14.
10.6
After the expiration of the Personal Data storage period, we shall anonymize or permanently erase your Personal Data. Please note that Veriff processes, maintains, and uses aggregated or de-identified information only in a de-identified fashion and will not attempt to re-identify such information, except as permitted by law.
11. Children’s Personal Data
Here you can find information on how we deal with children’s Personal Data.
We may process the Personal Data of children (i.e., persons under 16* years of age; *depending on jurisdiction) or adolescents (i.e., persons under 18* years of age; *or other valid online consenting age) in case the Data Controller has such End Users. In this case, the Data Controller is responsible for taking the steps to ensure that there is a legal basis and any required notice and consent requirements for such processing (e.g., a consent from a guardian of that child) have been met. If we learn that we have collected the Personal Data of a child without the guardian’s consent, we will take steps to delete the information as soon as possible.
12. Jurisdiction specific notices
You may have different rights depending on where you reside. For example, some U.S. states have enacted privacy laws that grant their residents certain rights and require specific disclosures (“State Privacy Laws”). Furthermore, you will find additional disclosures in this section if you are from Brazil. If you are done reading this section or you are not from any of the addressed jurisdictions, please click
here
or scroll up to start reading from the beginning of this Privacy Notice.
Information contained in section 12 applies as a supplement to the other information contained in this Privacy Notice. Should there be any inconsistency or ambiguity between this section and any other part of this Privacy Notice, this section shall prevail.
12.1 Additional Information for Individuals Residing in Certain U.S. States
If you reside in California, Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Iowa, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Oregon, Texas, Utah or Virginia, this section applies to you. This section also serves as our California notice at collection.
Additional Disclosures
Our Privacy Notice explains how we collect (see
section 4
), use (see
section 5
), and disclose (see
section 8
) information about you, as well as our targeted advertising and analytics practices (see
sections 4
(9) and (10)). As required by certain State Privacy Laws, we use the provisions  below to explain this same information.
(1) We collect the following categories of Personal Information: identifiers, biometric information, demographic information, commercial information, internet or other electronic activity information, geolocation data, audio, electronic, or similar information, professional or employment-related information, inferences, and sensitive personal information.
(2) We collect Personal Information for the business and commercial purposes described in
section 5
. We disclose Personal Information for the business and commercial purposes described in
section 8
.
We disclose the following categories of Personal Information for business purposes to the following categories of recipients:
The following categories of Personal Information: End-User related identifiers, demographic information, commercial information, internet or other electronic activity information, geolocation data, audio, electronic, or similar information, inferences, and sensitive Personal Data; each have been disclosed to the following categories of Recipients: Data Controllers for whom we are Data Processors (e.g. Customers), our authorized Data Processors (sub-processors), authorized third party sites (e.g. external registries), and, as relevant on a case by case basis, to supervisory authorities, courts and government agencies.
The following categories of Personal Information: Customer Representative related identifiers, commercial information, internet or other electronic activity information, audio, electronic, or similar information; each have been disclosed to the following categories of Recipients: our authorized Data Processors (sub-processors), authorities and organizations intermediating or providing (electronic) mail, compliance or payment services, and, as relevant on a case by case basis, to supervisory authorities, courts and government agencies, debt collection agencies and credit registers.
The following categories of Personal Information: Customer Representative related identifiers, commercial information, electronic, or similar information; each have been disclosed to the following categories of Recipients: advertising and marketing partners, companies carrying out satisfaction surveys.
(3) As described in
section 4
above, we collect Personal Information from various sources, including directly from you, automatically when you go through the Service flow, and from third-party sources.
(4) We retain Personal Information as described in
section 10
above.
(5) We disclose certain categories of Personal Information to show you targeted ads on third-party properties, and to understand and improve your experience with our Services. These disclosures may be considered “sales”, “sharing” or use of your information for “targeted advertising” under State Privacy Laws. We have disclosed the following categories of Personal Information to the following categories of third parties for such purposes:
Identifiers may have been disclosed to advertising networks, internet service providers, data analytics providers, operating systems and platforms, and social networks.
Internet or other electronic network activity information may have been disclosed to advertising networks, internet service providers, data analytics providers, operating systems and platforms, and social networks.
(6) Our “sale,” “sharing” and “targeted advertising” activities do not apply to Personal Information that we collect in the course of providing identity verification services to our Customers. Rather, these activities relate to (1) individual Visitors browsing our website and (2) the business contact information of our Customer Representatives for purposes such as serving advertisements to those audiences on non-Veriff properties. Moreover, Veriff does not knowingly sell or share personal information about consumers under the age of 16, or higher age where required by law.
(7) We do not process sensitive Personal Information outside of our role as a Data Processor (i.e., for Service provision and permitted internal Service improvement purposes). For information about how Customers may process such information and any related rights you may have, please contact the relevant Customer directly.
(8)
Your Privacy Rights Under State Privacy Laws
The bullets below describe the rights available to you under State Privacy Laws. For additional information, such as how we verify requests, please see
section 7
above.
You have the right to opt out of activities that we engage in that constitute “targeted advertising,” “sharing,” or “sales”  at any time by following the instructions on the
“Your Privacy Choices” page
.
You have the right to (1) request to know more about and access your personal information, including in a portable format, (2) request deletion of your personal information, and (3) request correction of inaccurate personal information.  To do so, please contact our data protection officer (DPO) via email at
privacy@veriff.com
or by submitting
this form
.
Authorized Agents.
You have a right to submit a rights request via an authorized agent, you can read more about it in
section 7.4.(11)
above.
You have the right not to be discriminated against for exercising any of your privacy rights.
If we deny your request, you may appeal our decision by contacting us at
privacy@veriff.com
. If you have concerns about the result of an appeal, you may contact the attorney general in the state where you reside.
Notice of Financial Incentives.
We may from time to time also offer various financial incentives. For example, we may provide coupons, or other benefits to Customers who participate in feedback or research surveys. If you choose to participate in a financial incentive, we collect personal information from you, such as identifiers (like your email address or phone number), professional or employment-related information, inferences drawn about your preferences, and other categories of personal data that relate to or are reasonably capable of being associated with you. More detailed information will be provided at the time of collection. You can opt into a financial incentive by following the sign-up or participation instructions provided, and, for any ongoing benefits, you can opt-out at any time, such as by following the unsubscribe instructions in the applicable program’s terms and conditions, promotional emails, or text messages, or contacting us at
privacy@veriff.com
. If you request that we delete Personal Information that is essential to providing you with the financial incentive, we will not be able to provide you with such benefits going forward. In some cases, we may provide additional terms and conditions for a financial incentive, which we will provide to you when you sign up. The value of your personal information is reasonably related to the value of the offer or discount presented to you.
12.2 Notice to Individuals Who are Residents of the State of Illinois and the State of Texas
(1) The Illinois Biometric Information Privacy Act, 740 ILCS 14/1 et seq., and the Business and Commerce Code of Texas on the Capture or Use of Biometric Identifiers, Tex.Bus.& Comm.Code § 503.001, regulates the collection, storage, use, and retention of “biometric identifiers'' and “biometric information”. “Biometric identifier” means a retina or iris scan, fingerprint, voiceprint, or scan of hand or face geometry. Biometric identifiers do not include writing samples, written signatures, photographs, human biological samples used for valid scientific testing or screening, demographic data, tattoo descriptions, or physical descriptions such as height, weight, hair color, or eye color. “Biometric information” means any information, regardless of how it is captured, converted, stored, or shared, based on an individual’s biometric identifier used to identify an individual.
(2) Veriff collects certain biometric identifiers and biometric information, namely face scan information (face geometry information and information based on that), during the identity verification process. Veriff collects and uses this information to verify your identity, prevent fraud, and provide authentication Services to our Customers on an ongoing basis.
(3) For Illinois residents, we will permanently destroy their biometric identifiers and biometric information when the initial purpose for collecting or obtaining such identifiers or information has been satisfied or within 3 years of the individual’s last interaction with Veriff’s Customers, whichever occurs first.
(4) For Texas residents, we will permanently destroy their biometric identifiers the later of (1) one year after the purpose for collecting the identifier expires, or (2) one year after any recordkeeping obligations imposed by law in connection with the collection of the biometric identifier expires.
(5) Except where prohibited by law, your biometric data and other information is accessible only to us and our service providers, which process your data only on our behalf to provide the Services. We do not share biometric data with any other third parties. Except where prohibited by law, Veriff may use your information, except for the biometric identifiers and other information of Illinois and Texas residents, for Service development (as described in sections 5.2 and 6).  The Customer on whose behalf Veriff processes your data may receive from us information about you, such as copies of the identification document and photo you provided us, and data indicating whether we were able to identify and authenticate your identity, but we do not disclose to Customers your biometric data.
(6) By clicking the relevant icons presented prior to the verification or authentication process, and choosing to continue, you acknowledge and agree that you have read the relevant disclosures, and that you voluntarily consent to Veriff’s collection, storage, retention, use, and disclosure of your data, including biometric data.
(7) Veriff uses the reasonable standards of care within its industry to store, transmit, and protect from disclosure your biometric data, in a manner that is the same as or more protective than the manner in which it stores, transmits, and protects other confidential and/or sensitive information. Veriff does not sell, lease, trade or otherwise profit from the biometric data.
12.3 Notice to Individuals From Brazil Regarding Your Privacy Rights Under Brazilian Data Protection Laws
(1) Section 12.3 is applicable to the processing of Personal Information subject to the Brazilian General Data Protection Law (Law No. 13,709/2018, the “
LGPD
”, as amended) and the guidelines and regulations of the Brazilian National Data Protection Authority (the “
ANPD
”). That is, this section covers any (i) data processing that takes place in Brazil; (ii) processing activity intended to offer or supply goods or services or to process data of individuals located in Brazil; or (iii) personal data processed that was collected in Brazil (including data collected of data subjects that were in Brazil at the time of collection). Any terms defined in the LGPD have the same meaning when used in this section.
(2)
Your Rights.
The LGPD gives you specific rights to your Personal Information, as described in Article 18 et. seq. of the LGPD and below:
Right to confirmation and access:
right to obtain confirmation that your personal information is being processed, and the right to access such data.
Right to correction:
right to request correction of incomplete, inaccurate, or outdated personal information.
Right to anonymization and deletion:
right to request the transformation of personal information into anonymized data and to delete unnecessary or excessive personal information, or of personal information processed in noncompliance with the provisions of the LGPD.
Right to portability:
right to request that your personal information be transferred to another service or product supplier, according to Brazilian Data Protection Authority’s (“ANPD”) regulation, provided that the trade and industrial secrets are respected.
Right to obtain information
about the entities with whom the personal information is shared.
Right to withdrawal consent:
if the processing requires the granting of consent, you may withdraw such consent at any moment and, subsequently, request the deletion of such data.
Right to obtain information
about the possibility of not providing consent and the consequences of denial.
Right to deny:
right to deny data processing of personal information, in case the processing is not in compliance with the LGPD.
Right to review decisions taken solely by automated processing:
if decisions are taken based on automated processing (without human intervention) of personal information, and such processing could affect your interests, you may request a review of these decisions.
(3)
Contact details and information.
If you have any questions or comments about the processing of your Personal Information subject to the LGPD, including the ways in which We collect and use your Personal Information and your rights regarding such use, or have any comments, questions or concerns about this Privacy Notice, please do not hesitate to contact our Data Protection Officer MKR Consultoria Ltda at
dpo@veriff.com
.
13. Identity verification with the UKDIATF Certified Identity Verification Solution (Medium Level)
Read about how Veriff handles your personal data when you are directed by the Customer to use the Service to identify yourself using the UK Digital Identity and Attribute Trust Framework (UKDIATF) Certified Identity Verification Solution (Medium Level), for example for digital DBS, Right to Work or Right to Rent check as determined by the Customer.
This section applies to the Personal Data processing related to UKDIATF Certified Identity Verification Solution (Medium Level). No specifications in this section apply to UKDIATF Certified Identity Verification Solution (Low Level).
For the purposes of this section, the Service entails biometric personal identity verification as described in section 5.1 and additional activity history and identity fraud checks as described in section 13.5. Should there be any inconsistency or ambiguity between the terms of this section and any other part of this document, these terms shall prevail.
13.1
The Service is used by Veriff’s Customers to verify your identity, for example for conducting digital DBS, Right to Work or Right to Rent checks. This identity verification is conducted under the requirements foreseen in the Department for Culture, Media and Sport’s UK Digital Identity and Attributes Trust Framework (UKDIATF).
13.2
In the context of the Service, Veriff processes End-User Personal Data as directed by our Customers for the provision of the Service, whereas our Customers are the Data Controllers and Veriff is the Data Processor. Veriff is a Data Controller for compiling and retaining reports. Veriff is jointly a Data Controller with Cifas, a company registered in England and Wales under company number 02584687 and with registered office at 6th Floor Lynton House, 7-12 Tavistock Square, London WC1H 9LT (Cifas) for conducting identity fraud checks against and filing reports to the databases operated by Cifas.
13.3
Personal Data processing activities and legal basis. For offering the Service to the Customer, including for sharing your identity verification details with the Customer, Veriff relies on the legal basis ensured by the Customer, as is described in section 5.1. On the basis of Veriff’s legitimate interest in fraud (or otherwise unlawful and dishonest conduct) prevention, detection and investigation, Veriff conducts identity fraud checks against database operated by Cifas, and if Veriff suspects fraudulent activity, then Veriff may compile and retain reports and file these to Cifas. In the context of the Service, Veriff does not process your Personal Data for marketing purposes or in any other way not described in this Privacy Notice.
13.4
For the purposes of the Service, the Personal Data described in section 4.1 are being collected and processed. The Personal Data is retained as described in section 10.
13.5
Personal Data disclosures and reporting. Possible Personal Data recipients are described in section 8.1-8.3. As a part of the Service, Veriff conducts activity history and identity fraud checks. To conduct the said checks, Veriff discloses a limited set of Personal Data to (i) electoral roll and credit reference sub-processor (for M1B profile); (ii) politically exposed persons check sub-processor ComplyAdvantage (for M1B profile), and (iii) Cifas as a fraud prevention agency (for M1A and M1B profiles).
13.6
If Veriff reasonably suspects that you are committing identity fraud (or otherwise unlawful and dishonest conduct) when using the Service and as a result of the investigation Veriff determines that the fraud meets the criteria for reporting to Cifas, Veriff will submit a report to Cifas.
13.7
The Personal Data we have collected from you will be shared with fraud prevention agencies, who will use it to prevent fraud and money laundering and to verify your identity. If fraud is detected, you could be refused with certain services, finance or employment. Further details of how your Personal Data will be used by us and fraud prevention agencies, and your data protection rights, can be found by https://www.cifas.org.uk/fpn.
13.8
Your rights in relation to Personal Data. Your Personal Data is protected by legal rights, which include your right to access your Personal Data, right to object to our processing of your Personal Data and to automated decisions made about you (see also section 6.4(ii)); request that your Personal Data is erased or corrected; right to complain to your local data protection authority. Please see further information about exercising your rights in section 7.
14. Veriff's Demo app and testing Veriff's session flow
Read about testing Veriff’s session flow.
14.1
Veriff’s Demo app and website session flow allows to test and experience Veriff’s verification flow as an end user. The flow provides the experience End-Users will get when Veriff’s Customer is integrated with Veriff.
14.2
When you test the verification flow in the Demo app or on our Website, Veriff will process your data as mentioned in section 4.12. The Personal Data processed for the purpose of introducing our verification flow demo will be retained for up to 1 day.
15. Contact details and information
Here you find our contact details.
Please review this Privacy Notice carefully and contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO) at
privacy@veriff.com
if you have any comments, questions or concerns. You can also contact us via an
online form
.
16. Availability of and changes to the Privacy Notice
Here you can find information about changes made to the Privacy Notice and how we inform you about the changes.
16.1
This Privacy Notice is available on our Website.
16.2
Kindly note that we may modify the Privacy Notice from time to time. If we make changes, we will notify you of such as by revising the date of this Privacy Notice. If we make material changes, we will provide you with additional notice (such as by adding a statement to the Services or sending you a notification).
16.3
You are advised to review this Privacy Notice periodically for any changes. Changes to this Privacy Notice are effective when they are posted on this page.
Valid from: July 30, 2020
Last update: March 11, 2025
Products
Identity and Document Verification
Proof of Address
Database Verification Checks
Age Validation
KYC Onboarding
Biometric Authentication
AML Screening
Age Estimation
Fraud Protect
Fraud Intelligence
Solutions
By Industry
Financial Services
Mobility
Crypto
Gaming
Education
Healthcare
HR Management
By Use Case
New account onboarding
Age verification
Driver validation
Customer identity and access management
Right to Work
Right to Rent
Resources
Blog
Case studies
Help center
Trust Center
Documentation
Service status
Supported documents
Supported languages
About
Our story
Careers
Press
Switch language
​
English
​
©2025 Veriff. All rights reserved
Privacy notice
Cookie notice
Bug bounty
Security and compliance
Recruitment privacy notice
Accessibility statement
Sub-policy 4
https://onfido.com/privacy/:
English
Español
Italiano
Français
Take a tour
Blog
Support
Sign in
Table of Contents
Onfido Privacy Policy
Our Privacy Policies
1. This Privacy Policy
2. The Information We Collect and How We Use It On Behalf Of Our Clients
3. Using Information As Controller
4. Data Sharing
5. Information Security
6. Data Storage
7. Your Rights
8. Government and Law Enforcement Requests
9. Contact Onfido or our Data Protection Officer
Table of Contents
Onfido Privacy Policy
Our Privacy Policies
1. This Privacy Policy
2. The Information We Collect and How We Use It On Behalf Of Our Clients
3. Using Information As Controller
4. Data Sharing
5. Information Security
6. Data Storage
7. Your Rights
8. Government and Law Enforcement Requests
9. Contact Onfido or our Data Protection Officer
Our Privacy Policies
This Privacy Policy explains how Onfido, an Entrust company, (“we”, “us”, “our”) uses personal information about our clients’ users, and others, to provide our Identity Services on behalf of our clients. Users located in the US should also refer to
Onfido’s Facial Scan and Voice Recording Policy
which takes priority over the information below to the extent there is any inconsistency or ambiguity.
If you are looking for details of the personal information we collect in other circumstances, please see the relevant policy listed below:
Our
Website and B2B Privacy Policy
explains how we collect, use, and otherwise process personal information of people who visit our websites or otherwise interact with Onfido in a business to business capacity.
Our
Cookie and SDK Policy
contains information about the cookies we use, why we use them, and your privacy choices regarding cookies.
If you are a candidate applying for a role at Onfido, please see the Candidate Privacy Policy displayed in our Application Portal.
Please note that if you are a resident of California, Onfido’s California Privacy Notice does not apply to our use of your personal information as described in this Privacy Policy because when we use information to provide our Identity Services, we use this information as a service provider on behalf of a client. The client, as the business, may have additional obligations under California law, including the California Consumer Privacy Act, and we suggest you review their privacy policy for further details.
1. This Privacy Policy
At Onfido, we’re simplifying digital identity for everyone. We help our clients to verify their users so they can access their services quickly, easily and - most important of all - securely. When we verify an identity, carry out checks related to an identity, or provide user authentication services (our “
Identity Services
”), we’re committed to protecting the privacy and security of that identity.
When we process your personal information so we can provide Identity Services to a client, we are acting on the client’s behalf as their service provider and processor. The section below headed “
The Information We Collect and How We Use It On Behalf Of Our Clients
” explains what we do with this information, but if you are a user of an Onfido client you should review the client’s privacy policy for full information about how your personal information is collected and used.
As well as handling your personal information on behalf of a client in order to provide Identity Services to them, we may also handle your personal information on our own behalf as a controller. For example, we may use the personal information that we collect when providing our Identity Services, and personal information that is publicly available, to develop and improve our Identity Services. For information about how we use personal information as a controller, please see the section of this Privacy Policy headed “
Using Information As Controller
.”
We may need to update this Privacy Policy from time to time. If we make material changes, we will publish those changes before they come into effect and notify our clients so they can consider whether to update their own policies and notify their users.
2. The Information We Collect and How We Use It On Behalf Of Our Clients
To provide our Identity Services to a client, we collect certain personal information about the client’s users.
Our
clients
are organizations that have asked Onfido to verify someone’s identity, or to carry out checks related to their identity.
Our clients’
users
are the individuals whose identities a client has asked us to verify or otherwise check.
We may collect personal information about a user from the client, from the user, or from third party data providers (“Data Providers”). Data Providers are trusted third party service providers or public authorities who provide additional information depending on the Identity Service a client has chosen to use.
The following paragraphs provide details of the personal information we collect on behalf of a client depending on which of our Identity Services the client chooses to use. If you are in the EEA or UK, our client is responsible for identifying a legal basis which permits your personal information to be used for the purposes described below; you should review their privacy policy for further details.
Document Checks
Onfido’s
document checks
verify identity documents from across the globe by analyzing an image or video of the document. Our system extracts information from the image/video or, if possible, from the security chip embedded in the document. Our models analyze the authenticity of the document, which may include machine-readable zones, barcodes, QR codes, and security chips, to verify whether the document is genuine or shows signs of tampering. We will also compare the image or video of the identity document with information about compromised identities that have been leaked or otherwise made publicly available.
Information collected: personal information extracted from a user’s identity document, for example name, document number, date of birth, nationality, type of document, issuing country, expiration date, information embedded in barcodes, QR codes, security chips and features (which will vary depending on the type of document), and the image metadata associated with the image or video of the document.
Important: If you are a user living in the Netherlands, please be advised that Onfido may automatically mask your
BSN number
on your identity document in our back-end systems when required under Dutch law, and particularly the Dutch Prevention of Money Laundering and Terrorist Financing Act.
Biometric Checks and Authentication
When providing
biometric checks
as part of our Identity Services, we’ll ask for an image or video (including an audio recording) of a user’s face (a “
Selfie
”), as well as an image or video to use as a reference image (for example, an image of their identity document). We generate two scans of the user’s face (one from the Selfie, and one from the reference image) and we compare those two scans to assess whether the person in the Selfie is likely to be the same person pictured in the reference image. Additionally, as part of our Identity Services, we will also evaluate the authenticity of the images and videos (including audio recordings) and identity documents, including detecting whether there is a genuine human or physical document in your photos/videos, and identifying signs of tampering, coercion or social engineering.
Except as described in this Privacy Policy under the section below headed “Fraud checks, including device integrity and fraud signals”, when performing biometric checks we do not store the extracted face scans once the check is complete. Where a client has asked us to provide an authentication service, the client may ask Onfido to store a reference image chosen by the client for each relevant user. (This image is retained in accordance with retention periods set by the client and subject to any maximum retention periods specified by Onfido or in applicable laws.) When Onfido is asked to authenticate a user, we will generate two face scans - one using a new image of the user and one using the reference image we have stored. If the two images match, the authentication is confirmed. Clients who wish to use an authentication service without the need for Onfido to store a reference image can choose to store an encrypted version of the face scan relating to a reference image themselves (including on the user’s device). When Onfido is asked to authenticate a user, we will be given access to the stored face scan and we will compare it to a new face scan that we generate using a new image of the user. If the two images match, the authentication is confirmed.
Information collected: images or videos (including audio recordings) of a user and/or of their identity document, metadata extracted from those images or videos, and data extracted from those images or videos that may be construed as a scan of face geometry or a voiceprint and which may be considered to be biometric identifiers or biometric information by applicable US biometric privacy laws. Users located in the US should refer to
Onfido’s Facial Scan and Voice Recording Policy
for details.
Data Verification
Onfido provides clients with
data verification
checks via a network of trusted Data Providers (defined above) and our own internal checks. These checks enable clients to verify their users, detect fraud and comply with anti money laundering (AML) and Know Your Client (KYC) requirements. We conduct these checks by comparing personal information provided by the client or the user with information held by Data Providers or information extracted from documents, e.g. a utility bill for
proof of address
checks. Our global network of data verification services varies depending on a user's location and includes voter and driving license registers and other government databases, police databases, consumer credit agencies, sanctions and Politically Exposed Persons (PEP) lists, adverse media sources, utility companies, mobile network providers and other trusted commercial sources. At the request of a client, these services may be provided on an ongoing basis, for example where a client’s regulatory obligations require ongoing monitoring against sanction and PEP lists.
Information collected: the information collected will vary depending on the availability of checks in the user’s location and the Identity Services selected by Onfido’s clients. It may include contact details such as postal address, email address, telephone number, social security number or other national identity number, information extracted from a utility bill a user uploads or other information provided by the Data Provider e.g. a user’s mobile network operator, publicly available information from media searches, sanctions and PEP lists.
Fraud checks, including device integrity and fraud signals
Onfido leverages a number of different
fraud detection
capabilities. Some of these depend on the scope of the Identity Services selected by Onfido’s clients, whereas other fraud checks are applied across all of the above services. For example, Onfido will analyze the metadata associated with the user’s Selfie and the image or video of their identity document (to identify whether any editing software can be detected) to assess the likelihood that the user is genuine.
Onfido can also help clients to determine whether a device, email address or phone number has previously been used in relation to suspected fraudulent activity, shows unusual usage patterns, has been manipulated or otherwise indicates that the user may not be genuine. At a client’s request, Onfido and our Data Providers may collect ‘passive signals’ from the client (for example mobile number or email address) or a user’s device as they engage with the client’s website or app or Onfido’s Identity Services. Such information may include device identifiers, IP address, information about the device (for example the operating system used, whether the device is providing false randomized device and network information or has otherwise been compromised) and how the user interacts with it. Together this information helps Onfido and our Data Providers assess the likelihood of you being a genuine user, assign a risk score and infer certain information such as your broad geographical location from your IP address.
At a client’s request, we can also check whether we have previously verified a user on behalf of that client by comparing the information submitted as part of a new Document Check and/or Biometric Check, to information we have previously verified for that client. (More specifically, at a client’s request we will retain information (including face scans depending on the service the client has chosen to use) extracted from a user’s identity document or Selfie, and compare this retained information to the newly submitted information. As explained further below, clients determine how long we retain the extracted information). This helps our client not only verify users’ identities but further protects them and their users from fraud by helping clients understand when a user may be generating multiple identities, editing and tampering with documents or manipulating device or network information.
Information collected: the information collected will vary depending on the availability of checks in the user’s location and the Identity Services selected by Onfido’s clients. It may include: the information listed in the Document Check and/or Biometric Check sections above; data extracted from images or videos of identity documents that may be construed as a scan of face geometry and which may be considered to be biometric identifiers or biometric information by applicable US biometric privacy laws (users located in the US should refer to
Onfido’s Facial Scan and Voice Recording Policy
for details); mobile number, email address, IP address, device details including device identifiers and other information about the user’s device and how they are interacting with our Identity Services (for example we may collect information about the upload time, which version of our software was used, the camera name and model used to capture any images and whether there are any indicators that the device has been tampered with or emulated). We may also analyze how the user is interacting with their device to assess the likelihood of of the user being a genuine user and who they say they are, for example
fraudsters
will cut and paste large volumes of information from their clipboard, use this functionality multiple times and otherwise navigate between applications on their device very differently from a genuine user. Onfido and our Data Providers may also use such information to infer other information about the user, for example their broad geographical location from their IP address, or to calculate an identity risk score to assist clients in determining whether the user is a genuine user.
Onfido Reports and Automated Decision Making
Once we have verified an identity or run a check, we share the results with the client in a report (“
Onfido Report
”). Below, we have provided a graphical representation of an Onfido Report:
Each Onfido Report contains an overall result of ‘Clear’ or ‘Consider’:
If we’re able to verify the identity of a user, and the requested checks do not show signs of fraud or other anomalies, we notify the client that the checks are Clear.
If we’re unable to verify the identity of a user, or the user isn’t able to pass all requested checks or the checks show signs of fraud or other anomalies, we return a Consider result.
If we return a Consider result, we will also provide a detailed breakdown of the reasons why. (The reasons are generated from the different machine learning models and/or human powered processes that are used to verify an identity or perform a check.)
Onfido Reports contain recommendations only and the reasons behind them. It is then for the client to decide how to proceed with a user - based on the content of the Onfido Report, but also on the basis of other information available to them (including additional information they may have or decide to request from their users).
By providing our clients with these detailed Onfido Reports, our aim is to empower our clients to make informed decisions about their users and to provide help to users that are having difficulty in passing an Onfido check.
3. Using Information As Controller
As explained above, when we use personal information to provide Identity Services to our clients, we are acting on their behalf as their service provider and processor. However, we also process the personal information of users, and others, on our own behalf (as a “controller”) for the purposes described in this section. If you are in the EEA or UK, we will only use your personal information for a particular purpose where we have a “legal basis” for this. We have set out below the legal bases we rely upon for each purpose.
To develop and improve our Identity Services (including machine learning technologies)
At Onfido, our vision is to simplify digital identity. To do this, provided we have the permission of our clients and it is not prohibited by applicable law, we use the personal information we collect about our clients’ users (as described above) to improve and develop our Identity Services. For the same purpose, we may also use personal information that has been made publicly available or that we have obtained from a third party provided this is not prohibited by applicable law.
Developing and improving our Identity Services includes building and improving our technology (such as our machine learning technologies and algorithms) and developing and testing new checks, products and services to better verify a user’s identity and/or detect fraud. For example, we may need to train our models to recognise a novel fraud attack, a new version of an ID document or to minimize bias and improve performance. As part of this work, we train our technology to recognize specific patterns in information and make predictions about new sets of information based on those patterns. This is known as machine learning. We also train our human analysts to perform those tasks so they can assist when our machine learning models aren’t best suited for the task or are still learning. Sometimes, we’ll also re-run and re-submit checks to ensure our Identity Services are working properly, particularly when testing a new feature or service for quality checks. Together, these developments help make Onfido’s Identity Services stronger and safer for all clients and users.
We process personal information for these purposes on the basis that it is necessary for the legitimate interest of our clients and Onfido. Financial crime, fraud, and corruption are serious issues that affect not only the law enforcement community but financial institutions, the private sector, and other major corporations – as well as individuals themselves. As such, Onfido considers there is a clear legitimate interest in improving and developing our Identity Services for the purpose of continuing to effectively tackle and reduce fraud.
Where we use sensitive personal information for these purposes (for example, information which could potentially reveal information about someone’s racial or ethnic origin), we primarily process this information on the basis that it is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest. Such public interests include ensuring equality of treatment across all types of users by measuring and mitigating algorithmic bias with a view to providing fair and inclusive Identity Services, which effectively detect fraud, and are balanced against the rights and freedoms of users. When developing our services, Onfido implements specific measures to safeguard the rights and freedoms of those individuals whose data is used for this purpose, including pseudonymisation (where possible), impact assessments and strict security controls to safeguard their fundamental rights and their interests.
To compile statistics, benchmarking and analytics
We use personal information (such as check results, identity document type, and device metadata) to create statistics regarding the use and performance of our Identity Services. We provide these statistics to our clients so that they and we may use them to, for example, conduct benchmarking and analytics (for example, to compare a client’s missed fraud rates to the general missed fraud rate for an industry, or to analyze fraud trends). We also use these statistics to gain market insights (for example, to enhance understanding of missed fraud trends and identify fraud patterns) and to inform our decision making on product improvements. An individual cannot be identified from these statistics and where possible, we pseudonymise, aggregate and/or de-identify (and where feasible anonymise) personal information which is used for these purposes.
We process personal information for these purposes on the basis that it is necessary for Onfido’s and our clients’ legitimate interests in understanding (at the aggregate level) how people are using our Identity Services.
For compliance with applicable law/regulation, to exercise, establish or defend legal rights or claims, or to protect someone’s vital interests
Onfido may process the personal information we collect about our clients’ users (as described above) where this is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation, to exercise, establish or defend legal rights or claims, or to protect someone’s vital interests. For example, we may be required by law to:
disclose information in response to a request from a government or law enforcement body as described in the section below headed “
Government and Law Enforcement Requests
”;
collect a user’s broad geographic location (e.g. country or city-level location), either directly from them or the client or by approximating this based on the user’s device’s IP address, to enable Onfido and our clients to comply with global sanctions requirements and the increasing number of biometric and privacy laws that apply to our Identity Services. We use this broad geographic location to determine a user’s location to display the relevant consent screen and collect any necessary biometric consents or identify if a user is located in a sanctioned country where we are prohibited by law from providing services.
In connection with a business transaction or to obtain professional advice
Onfido may need to process your personal information in connection with an actual or proposed divestiture, merger, acquisition, joint venture, bankruptcy, dissolution, reorganization, or any other similar transaction or proceeding, or to obtain professional advice. We process personal information for these purposes on the basis that it is necessary for Onfido’s legitimate interest in running its business in a commercial and compliant manner.
4. Data Sharing
In addition to sharing personal information with clients and Data Providers (as described above), Onfido also shares personal information:
With third parties who help us provide our Identity Services and perform tasks on our behalf. This includes: information technology and related infrastructure providers (who provide us with a place to store your personal information); data analytics providers (who help us to analyze trends and provide market insights); and our business process outsourcing partners (whose staff perform human review and quality checks);
With other companies in the Onfido group of companies who help us to provide our services (for example, by providing ancillary engineering, technical or customer support);
With an actual or potential buyer, investor or partner (and its agents and advisers) in relation to a business transaction;
With parties that provide Onfido with professional (e.g. advisory and auditing) advice and services;
With a competent law enforcement body, regulatory, government agency, or court;
With any other person where instructed to do so by a client. For example, if a client has configured the Identity Services to check whether an identity document has been previously identified as lost, stolen, fraudulent, or otherwise compromised by a government or other external party, Onfido may share that compromised identity document on behalf of that client, and the government or other external party may retain a copy to the extent they consider it necessary, proportionate, and lawful. Under the instruction of clients and as permitted by applicable law, Onfido currently shares identity documents with the
UK Metropolitan Police
as part of their
Amberhill Database
for such purposes; and
To any other person where we have a legitimate legal reason for doing so.
Whenever legally possible, we seek to protect the personal information we share by imposing contractual privacy and security safeguards on the recipient of that information. In some cases, however, it’s not possible for us to do so — for example, when we have a legal obligation to disclose information to a government authority and that government authority is not willing to enter into such contractual safeguards.
If the sharing of personal information involves cross border international transfers of data, we make such transfers in accordance with relevant privacy law requirements. For example, if personal information that is processed subject to the GDPR is transferred outside of the EEA/UK to a country that the
European Commission does not consider provides an adequate level of protection for your personal information
, we will require the receiving party to enter into the European Commission approved Standard Contractual Clauses (and/or their UK and Switzerland equivalents). You can request a copy of these clauses by contacting us using the details in the section below headed “
Contact Onfido or our Data Protection Officer
.”
5. Information Security
Where possible, we pseudonymize, de-identify and/or aggregate personal information to protect privacy and minimize security risks. Pseudonymized data is where we replace, transform or remove information so that it no longer identifies an individual without additional information. Onfido also takes appropriate administrative, physical, technical and organizational measures designed to help protect the information it holds from loss, theft, misuse and unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration and destruction. For more information about information security at Onfido, please visit the
Guide to Security at Onfido
.
If you think you have identified a security vulnerability or bug in our Identity Services, please report it to the Onfido security team at
security@onfido.com
and as described in the
Onfido Responsible Security Bug Disclosure Policy
.
6. Data Storage
We provide our Identity Services on behalf of our clients for a variety of different reasons. Those reasons are identified by our clients, and we rely on them to tell us when they no longer need us to store the personal information we’ve collected on their behalf, subject to maximum retention periods imposed by applicable laws or defined by Data Providers or by Onfido.
Where we use personal information that has been made publicly available or that we have obtained from a third party to develop and improve our Identity Services (including machine learning technologies), we retain the information for as long as is necessary to complete the purpose for which the information was collected, subject to applicable laws and any retention periods.
Where we have a legitimate legal reason, we may store personal information for longer than described above – for example, where we are under a binding legal order not to destroy information.
7. Your Rights
Depending on where you live and subject to applicable privacy law, you may have the following rights in respect of the personal information we process about you as described in this Privacy Policy:
the right to request access to and disclosure of information that we hold.
the right to change and/or correct inaccurate information.
the right to block or suppress our processing of your information. This enables you to request that Onfido suspends the processing of your information in certain circumstances.
the right to object to our processing of your information where we are relying on a legitimate interest (or those of a third party) and you feel such processing impacts on your fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may demonstrate that we have compelling legitimate grounds to process your information which override your rights and freedoms.
the right to request that we delete your information, subject to certain exceptions.
the right to request portability of your information. We will provide to you, or a third party you have chosen, with your information in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format.
the right to withdraw your consent, if applicable. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
the right to lodge a complaint with your local data protection authority or regulator.
If you wish to exercise your rights in relation to how we use your personal information as described under the section headed "The Information We Collect and How We Use It On Behalf Of Our Clients”, please contact the client so they may respond to your request directly. (If you contact us instead of our client, we will notify the relevant client so they may fulfill your request.)
If you wish to exercise your rights in relation to how we use your personal information as described under the section headed “Using Information As Controller”, please contact us at
privacyrequests@onfido.com
or at the postal address below. If you exercise any of your data protection rights detailed in this section, we will not discriminate against you.
8. Government and Law Enforcement Requests
If you are a government or law enforcement body that wishes to request personal or confidential information related to a check that we may have conducted on a particular user, please contact the client on whose behalf the check was carried out. Since we provide our Identity Services on behalf of our clients, we are not able to disclose any information related to a specific check unless the relevant client directs us to do so, or we are subject to a legal requirement (such as a court order or statutory power mandating disclosure) to do so. If you wish to request the disclosure of information in respect of which there is such a legal requirement, please contact us at
privacyrequests@onfido.com
providing clear details of the legal requirement in your message.
9. Contact Onfido or our Data Protection Officer
If you would like more information about how Onfido collects and uses personal information, please contact Onfido at
privacyrequests@onfido.com
, or at: Attention: Privacy Office, Onfido Ltd, 14-18 Finsbury Square, 3rd Floor, London, EC2A 1AH, United Kingdom.
If you would like to raise a concern or otherwise communicate with our Data Protection Officer, you may contact them at
onfido@hewardmills.com
or at: Attention: Onfido Data Protection Officer, Heward Mills, 77 Farringdon Road, London, EC1M 3JU, United Kingdom.